
1. J Comput Neurosci. 2012 Jun;32(3):499-519. doi: 10.1007/s10827-011-0366-4. Epub
2011 Oct 5.

Relative contributions of local cell and passing fiber activation and silencing
to changes in thalamic fidelity during deep brain stimulation and lesioning: a
computational modeling study.

So RQ(1), Kent AR, Grill WM.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Biomedical Engineering, Duke University, Box 90281, Durham, NC
27708-0281, USA.

Deep brain stimulation (DBS) and lesioning are two surgical techniques used in
the treatment of advanced Parkinson's disease (PD) in patients whose symptoms are
not well controlled by drugs, or who experience dyskinesias as a side effect of
medications. Although these treatments have been widely practiced, the mechanisms
behind DBS and lesioning are still not well understood. The subthalamic nucleus
(STN) and globus pallidus pars interna (GPi) are two common targets for both DBS 
and lesioning. Previous studies have indicated that DBS not only affects local
cells within the target, but also passing axons within neighboring regions. Using
a computational model of the basal ganglia-thalamic network, we studied the
relative contributions of activation and silencing of local cells (LCs) and
fibers of passage (FOPs) to changes in the accuracy of information transmission
through the thalamus (thalamic fidelity), which is correlated with the
effectiveness of DBS. Activation of both LCs and FOPs during STN and GPi-DBS were
beneficial to the outcome of stimulation. During STN and GPi lesioning, effects
of silencing LCs and FOPs were different between the two types of lesioning. For 
STN lesioning, silencing GPi FOPs mainly contributed to its effectiveness, while 
silencing only STN LCs did not improve thalamic fidelity. In contrast, silencing 
both GPi LCs and GPe FOPs during GPi lesioning contributed to improvements in
thalamic fidelity. Thus, two distinct mechanisms produced comparable improvements
in thalamic function: driving the output of the basal ganglia to produce tonic
inhibition and silencing the output of the basal ganglia to produce tonic
disinhibition. These results show the importance of considering effects of
activating or silencing fibers passing close to the nucleus when deciding upon a 
target location for DBS or lesioning.

PMCID: PMC3288232
PMID: 21984318  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


2. J Biol Rhythms. 1999 Dec;14(6):433-48.

Limit cycle models for circadian rhythms based on transcriptional regulation in
Drosophila and Neurospora.

Leloup JC(1), Gonze D, Goldbeter A.

Author information: 
(1)Faculte des Sciences, Universite Libre de Bruxelles, Brussels, Belgium.

Comment in
    J Biol Rhythms. 1999 Dec;14(6):486-9.

We examine theoretical models for circadian oscillations based on transcriptional
regulation in Drosophila and Neurospora. For Drosophila, the molecular model is
based on the negative feedback exerted on the expression of the per and tim genes
by the complex formed between the PER and TIM proteins. For Neurospora,
similarly, the model relies on the feedback exerted on the expression of the frq 
gene by its protein product FRQ. In both models, sustained rhythmic variations in
protein and mRNA levels occur in continuous darkness, in the form of limit cycle 
oscillations. The effect of light on circadian rhythms is taken into account in
the models by considering that it triggers degradation of the TIM protein in
Drosophila, and frq transcription in Neurospora. When incorporating the control
exerted by light at the molecular level, we show that the models can account for 
the entrainment of circadian rhythms by light-dark cycles and for the damping of 
the oscillations in constant light, though such damping occurs more readily in
the Drosophila model. The models account for the phase shifts induced by light
pulses and allow the construction of phase response curves. These compare well
with experimental results obtained in Drosophila. The model for Drosophila shows 
that when applied at the appropriate phase, light pulses of appropriate duration 
and magnitude can permanently or transiently suppress circadian rhythmicity. We
investigate the effects of the magnitude of light-induced changes on oscillatory 
behavior. Finally, we discuss the common and distinctive features of circadian
oscillations in the two organisms.

PMID: 10643740  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


3. J Physiol. 1952 Aug;117(4):500-44.

A quantitative description of membrane current and its application to conduction 
and excitation in nerve.

HODGKIN AL, HUXLEY AF.

PMCID: PMC1392413
PMID: 12991237  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


4. J Physiol. 1977 Jun;268(1):177-210.

Reconstruction of the action potential of ventricular myocardial fibres.

Beeler GW, Reuter H.

1. A mathematical model of membrane action potentials of mammalian ventricular
myocardial fibres is described. The reconstruction model is based as closely as
possible on ionic currents which have been measured by the voltage-clamp
method.2. Four individual components of ionic current were formulated
mathematically in terms of Hodgkin-Huxley type equations. The model incorporates 
two voltage- and time-dependent inward currents, the excitatory inward sodium
current, i(Na), and a secondary or slow inward current, i(s), primarily carried
by calcium ions. A time-independent outward potassium current, i(K1), exhibiting 
inward-going rectification, and a voltage- and time-dependent outward current,
i(x1), primarily carried by potassium ions, are further elements of the model.3. 
The i(Na) is primarily responsible for the rapid upstroke of the action
potential, while the other current components determine the configuration of the 
plateau of the action potential and the re-polarization phase. The relative
importance of inactivation of i(s) and of activation of i(x1) for termination of 
the plateau is evaluated by the model.4. Experimental phenomena like slow
recovery of the sodium system from inactivation, frequency dependence of the
action potential duration, all-or-nothing re-polarization, membrane oscillations 
are adequately described by the model.5. Possible inadequacies and shortcomings
of the model are discussed.

PMCID: PMC1283659
PMID: 874889  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


5. Circ Res. 1991 Jun;68(6):1501-26.

A model of the ventricular cardiac action potential. Depolarization,
repolarization, and their interaction.

Luo CH(1), Rudy Y.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Biomedical Engineering, Case Western Reserve University,
Cleveland, Ohio 44106.

A mathematical model of the membrane action potential of the mammalian
ventricular cell is introduced. The model is based, whenever possible, on recent 
single-cell and single-channel data and incorporates the possibility of changing 
extracellular potassium concentration [K]o. The fast sodium current, INa, is
characterized by fast upstroke velocity (Vmax = 400 V/sec) and slow recovery from
inactivation. The time-independent potassium current, IK1, includes a
negative-slope phase and displays significant crossover phenomenon as [K]o is
varied. The time-dependent potassium current, IK, shows only a minimal degree of 
crossover. A novel potassium current that activates at plateau potentials is
included in the model. The simulated action potential duplicates the
experimentally observed effects of changes in [K]o on action potential duration
and rest potential. Physiological simulations focus on the interaction between
depolarization and repolarization (i.e., premature stimulation). Results
demonstrate the importance of the slow recovery of INa in determining the
response of the cell. Simulated responses to periodic stimulation include
monotonic Wenckebach patterns and alternans at normal [K]o, whereas at low [K]o
nonmonotonic Wenckebach periodicities, aperiodic patterns, and enhanced
supernormal excitability that results in unstable responses ("chaotic activity") 
are observed. The results are consistent with recent experimental observations,
and the model simulations relate these phenomena to the underlying ionic channel 
kinetics.

PMID: 1709839  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


6. Biol Cybern. 1977 Feb 7;25(3):163-76.

Motorneurons of different geometry and the size principle.

Traub RD.

PMID: 836920  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


7. Phys Med Biol. 2006 Dec 7;51(23):6141-56. Epub 2006 Nov 8.

Cell model for efficient simulation of wave propagation in human ventricular
tissue under normal and pathological conditions.

Ten Tusscher KH(1), Panfilov AV.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Theoretical Biology, Utrecht University, Padualaan 8, 3584 CH
Utrecht, The Netherlands. khwjtuss@hotmail.com

In this paper, we formulate a model for human ventricular cells that is efficient
enough for whole organ arrhythmia simulations yet detailed enough to capture the 
effects of cell level processes such as current blocks and channelopathies. The
model is obtained from our detailed human ventricular cell model by using
mathematical techniques to reduce the number of variables from 19 to nine. We
carefully compare our full and reduced model at the single cell, cable and 2D
tissue level and show that the reduced model has a very similar behaviour.
Importantly, the new model correctly produces the effects of current blocks and
channelopathies on AP and spiral wave behaviour, processes at the core of current
day arrhythmia research. The new model is well over four times more efficient
than the full model. We conclude that the new model can be used for efficient
simulations of the effects of current changes on arrhythmias in the human heart.

PMID: 17110776  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


8. J Physiol. 2006 Dec 1;577(Pt 2):617-39. Epub 2006 Sep 28.

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation: insights
from deletions during fictive locomotion.

Rybak IA(1), Shevtsova NA, Lafreniere-Roula M, McCrea DA.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Neurobiology and Anatomy, Drexel University College of Medicine,
Philadelphia, PA 19129, USA.

Comment in
    J Physiol. 2007 Apr 15;580(Pt. 2):363-4.

The mammalian spinal cord contains a locomotor central pattern generator (CPG)
that can produce alternating rhythmic activity of flexor and extensor
motoneurones in the absence of rhythmic input and proprioceptive feedback. During
such fictive locomotor activity in decerebrate cats, spontaneous omissions of
activity occur simultaneously in multiple agonist motoneurone pools for a number 
of cycles. During these 'deletions', antagonist motoneurone pools usually become 
tonically active but may also continue to be rhythmic. The rhythmic activity that
re-emerges following a deletion is often not phase shifted. This suggests that
some neuronal mechanism can maintain the locomotor period when motoneurone
activity fails. To account for these observations, a simplified computational
model of the spinal circuitry has been developed in which the locomotor CPG
consists of two levels: a half-centre rhythm generator (RG) and a pattern
formation (PF) network, with reciprocal inhibitory interactions between
antagonist neural populations at each level. The model represents a network of
interacting neural populations with single interneurones and motoneurones
described in the Hodgkin-Huxley style. The model reproduces the range of
locomotor periods and phase durations observed during real locomotion in adult
cats and permits independent control of the level of motoneurone activity and of 
step cycle timing. By altering the excitability of neural populations within the 
PF network, the model can reproduce deletions in which motoneurone activity fails
but the phase of locomotor oscillations is maintained. The model also suggests
criteria for the functional identification of spinal interneurones involved in
the mammalian locomotor pattern generation.

PMCID: PMC1890439
PMID: 17008376  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


9. Neuroscience. 1996 Mar;71(2):397-410.

Modeling N-methyl-D-aspartate-induced bursting in dopamine neurons.

Li YX(1), Bertram R, Rinzel J.

Author information: 
(1)Mathematical Research Branch, National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and
Kidney Diseases, National Institutes of Health, Bethesda, MD 20892, USA.

Burst firing of dopaminergic neurons of the substantia nigra pars compacta can be
induced in vitro by the glutamate agonist N-methyl-D-aspartate. It has been
suggested that the interburst hyperpolarization is due to Na+ extrusion by a
ouabain-sensitive pump [Johnson et al. (1992) Science 258, 665-667]. We formulate
and explore a theoretical model, with a minimal number of currents, for this
novel mechanism of burst generation. This minimal model is further developed into
a more elaborate model based on observations of additional currents and
hypotheses about their spatial distribution in dopaminergic neurons [Hounsgaard
(1992) Neuroscience 50, 513-518; Llinas et al. (1984) Brain Res. 294, 127-132].
Using the minimal model, we confirm that interaction between the regenerative,
inward N-methyl-D-aspartate-mediated current and the outward Na(+)-pump current
is sufficient to generate the slow oscillation (approximately 0.5 Hz) underlying 
the burst. The negative-slope region of the N-methyl-D-aspartate channel's
current-voltage relation is indispensable for this slow rhythm generation. The
time-scale of Na(+)-handling determines the burst's slow frequency. Moreover, we 
show that, given the constraints of sodium handling, such bursting is best
explained mechanistically by using at least two spatial, cable-like compartments:
a soma where action potentials are produced and a dendritic compartment where the
slow rhythm is generated. Our result is consistent with recent experimental
evidence that burst generation originates in distal dendrites [Seutin et al.
(1994) Neuroscience 58, 201-206]. Responses of the model to a number of
electrophysiological and pharmacological stimuli are consistent with known
responses observed under similar conditions. These include the persistence of the
slow rhythm when the tetrodotoxin-sensitive Na+ channel is blocked and when the
soma is voltage-clamped at -60 mV. Using our more elaborate model, we account for
details of the observed frequency adaptation in N-methyl-D-aspartate-induced
bursting, the origin of multiple spiking and bursting mechanisms, and the
interaction between two different bursting mechanisms. Besides reproducing
several well established firing patterns, this model also suggests that new
firing modes, not yet recorded, might also occur in dopaminergic neurons. This
model provides mechanistic insights and explanations into the origin of a variety
of experimentally observed membrane potential firing patterns in dopaminergic
neurons, including N-methyl-D-aspartate-induced bursting and its dendritic
origin. Such a model, capable of reproducing a number of realistic behaviors of
dopaminergic neurons, could be useful in further studies of the basal
ganglia-thalamocortical motor circuit. It may also shed light on bursting that
involves N-methyl-D-aspartate channel activity in other neuron types.

PMID: 9053795  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


10. Biophys J. 2007 Mar 1;92(5):1522-43. Epub 2006 Dec 8.

Kinetic properties of the cardiac L-type Ca2+ channel and its role in myocyte
electrophysiology: a theoretical investigation.

Faber GM(1), Silva J, Livshitz L, Rudy Y.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Biomedical Engineering, Case Western Reserve University,
Cleveland, Ohio, USA.

The L-type Ca(2+) channel (Ca(V)1.2) plays an important role in action potential 
(AP) generation, morphology, and duration (APD) and is the primary source of
triggering Ca(2+) for the initiation of Ca(2+)-induced Ca(2+)-release in cardiac 
myocytes. In this article we present: 1), a detailed kinetic model of Ca(V)1.2,
which is incorporated into a model of the ventricular mycoyte where it interacts 
with a kinetic model of the ryanodine receptor in a restricted subcellular space;
2), evaluation of the contribution of voltage-dependent inactivation (VDI) and
Ca(2+)-dependent inactivation (CDI) to total inactivation of Ca(V)1.2; and 3),
description of dynamic Ca(V)1.2 and ryanodine receptor channel-state occupancy
during the AP. Results are: 1), the Ca(V)1.2 model reproduces experimental
single-channel and macroscopic-current data; 2), the model reproduces rate
dependence of APD, [Na(+)](i), and the Ca(2+)-transient (CaT), and restitution of
APD and CaT during premature stimuli; 3), CDI of Ca(V)1.2 is sensitive to Ca(2+) 
that enters the subspace through the channel and from SR release. The relative
contributions of these Ca(2+) sources to total CDI during the AP vary with time
after depolarization, switching from early SR dominance to late Ca(V)1.2
dominance. 4), The relative contribution of CDI to total inactivation of Ca(V)1.2
is greater at negative potentials, when VDI is weak; and 5), loss of VDI due to
the Ca(V)1.2 mutation G406R (linked to the Timothy syndrome) results in APD
prolongation and increased CaT.

PMCID: PMC1796810
PMID: 17158566  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


11. J Neurosci. 1996 Oct 15;16(20):6402-13.

Gamma oscillation by synaptic inhibition in a hippocampal interneuronal network
model.

Wang XJ(1), Buzsaki G.

Author information: 
(1)Physics Department, Brandeis University, Waltham, Massachusetts 02254, USA.

Fast neuronal oscillations (gamma, 20-80 Hz) have been observed in the neocortex 
and hippocampus during behavioral arousal. Using computer simulations, we
investigated the hypothesis that such rhythmic activity can emerge in a random
network of interconnected GABAergic fast-spiking interneurons. Specific
conditions for the population synchronization, on properties of single cells and 
the circuit, were identified. These include the following: (1) that the amplitude
of spike afterhyperpolarization be above the GABAA synaptic reversal potential;
(2) that the ratio between the synaptic decay time constant and the oscillation
period be sufficiently large; (3) that the effects of heterogeneities be modest
because of a steep frequency-current relationship of fast-spiking neurons.
Furthermore, using a population coherence measure, based on coincident firings of
neural pairs, it is demonstrated that large-scale network synchronization
requires a critical (minimal) average number of synaptic contacts per cell, which
is not sensitive to the network size. By changing the GABAA synaptic maximal
conductance, synaptic decay time constant, or the mean external excitatory drive 
to the network, the neuronal firing frequencies were gradually and monotonically 
varied. By contrast, the network synchronization was found to be high only within
a frequency band coinciding with the gamma (20-80 Hz) range. We conclude that the
GABAA synaptic transmission provides a suitable mechanism for synchronized gamma 
oscillations in a sparsely connected network of fast-spiking interneurons. In
turn, the interneuronal network can presumably maintain subthreshold oscillations
in principal cell populations and serve to synchronize discharges of spatially
distributed neurons.

PMID: 8815919  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


12. J Neurophysiol. 1991 Sep;66(3):839-50.

A model of the T-type calcium current and the low-threshold spike in thalamic
neurons.

Wang XJ(1), Rinzel J, Rogawski MA.

Author information: 
(1)Mathematical Research Branch, National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and
Kidney Diseases, National Institutes of Health, Bethesda, Maryland 20892.

1. A model of the transient, low-threshold voltage-dependent (T-type) Ca2+
current is constructed using recent whole-cell voltage-clamp data from
enzymatically isolated rat thalamocortical relay neurons. The T-type Ca2+ current
is described according to the Hodgkin-Huxley scheme, using the m3h format, with
rate constants determined from the experimental data (22-24 degrees C;
extracellular Ca2+ concentration [Ca2+]o = 3 mM). 2. The T-type Ca2+ current
inactivates rapidly during maintained depolarization (time constant, Tau h
approximately 20 ms at -20 mV), yet recovery from inactivation is slow (time
constant, Tau r approximately 270 ms at -80 mV). To reconcile these observations,
a two-step kinetic scheme is proposed for the inactivation gate. Each of the time
constants in this scheme is voltage dependent, with a maximum at about -85 mV (45
ms for one and 275 ms for the other). 3. Numerical simulations of recovery in a
two-pulse, voltage-clamp protocol compare favorably with experimental results
obtained by Coulter et al. as well as those obtained in an independent series of 
experiments with guinea pig thalamic neurons ([Ca2+]o = 10 mM). 4. For
current-clamp simulations, a leakage current gL (V-VL) is included; with VL = -65
mV, the calculated resting membrane potential is -63 mV. 5. It is shown that the 
T-type Ca2+ current together with the leakage current suffices to describe the
low-threshold spike (LTS), a slow, triangular-shaped depolarizing event that can 
be evoked only from relatively hyperpolarized membrane potentials and that
underlies the burst firing of Na(+)-dependent action potentials in thalamic
neurons. Outward currents are not required to reproduce the basic shape of the
LTS. 6. The LTS can be activated with either a depolarizing current step from a
sufficiently hyperpolarized level or on termination of a hyperpolarizing current 
step. In either case, the amplitude of the LTS is a monotonically increasing,
sigmoid-shape function of the hyperpolarizing current step intensity. 7. Because 
of the slower kinetic step of the channel's inactivation gate, our model predicts
that recovery of the LTS to greater than one-half amplitude would require a
prolonged hyperpolarization of greater than 100 ms (at body temperature). This
imposes an upper limit (approximately 10 Hz) on the frequency of repetitive
hyperpolarization that can elicit a train of LTSs and hence on the frequency of
any rhythm that requires LTS-mediated bursting of thalamic neurons.(ABSTRACT
TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS)

PMID: 1661326  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


13. Biophys J. 1988 Sep;54(3):411-25.

Emergence of organized bursting in clusters of pancreatic beta-cells by channel
sharing.

Sherman A(1), Rinzel J, Keizer J.

Author information: 
(1)National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and Kidney Diseases-Mathematical 
Research Branch, Bethesda, Maryland.

Pancreatic beta-cells in an intact Islet of Langerhans exhibit bursting
electrical behavior. The Chay-Keizer model describes this using a
calcium-activated potassium (K-Ca) channel, but cannot account for the irregular 
spiking of isolated beta-cells. Atwater I., L. Rosario, and E. Rojas, Cell
Calcium. 4:451-461, proposed that the K-Ca channels, which are rarely open, are
shared by several cells. This suggests that the chaotic behavior of isolated
cells is stochastic. We have revised the Chay-Keizer model to incorporate voltage
clamp data of Rorsman and Trube and extended it to include stochastic K-Ca
channels. This model can describe the behavior of single cells, as well as that
of clusters of cells tightly coupled by gap junctions. As the size of the
clusters is increased, the electrical activity shows a transition from chaotic
spiking to regular bursting. Although the model of coupling is over-simplified,
the simulations lend support to the hypothesis that bursting is the result of
channel sharing.

PMCID: PMC1330341
PMID: 2850029  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


14. Biophys J. 1990 Oct;58(4):985-95.

Domain model for Ca2(+)-inactivation of Ca2+ channels at low channel density.

Sherman A(1), Keizer J, Rinzel J.

Author information: 
(1)National Institutes of Health, National Institutes of Diabetes and Digestive
and Kidney Diseases, Mathematical Research Branch, Bethesda, Maryland 20892.

The "shell" model for Ca2(+)-inactivation of Ca2+ channels is based on the
accumulation of Ca2+ in a macroscopic shell beneath the plasma membrane. The
shell is filled by Ca2+ entering through open channels, with the elevated Ca2+
concentration inactivating both open and closed channels at a rate determined by 
how fast the shell is filled. In cells with low channel density, the high
concentration Ca2+ "shell" degenerates into a collection of nonoverlapping
"domains" localized near open channels. These domains form rapidly when channels 
open and disappear rapidly when channels close. We use this idea to develop a
"domain" model for Ca2(+)-inactivation of Ca2+ channels. In this model the
kinetics of formation of an inactivated state resulting from Ca2+ binding to open
channels determines the inactivation rate, a mechanism identical with that which 
explains single-channel recordings on rabbit-mesenteric artery Ca2+ channels
(Huang Y., J. M. Quayle, J. F. Worley, N. B. Standen, and M. T. Nelson. 1989.
Biophys. J. 56:1023-1028). We show that the model correctly predicts five
important features of the whole-cell Ca2(+)-inactivation for mouse pancreatic
beta-cells (Plants, T. D. 1988. J. Physiol. 404:731-747) and that
Ca2(+)-inactivation has only minor effects on the bursting electrical activity of
these cells.

PMCID: PMC1281044
PMID: 2174274  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


15. Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A. 1991 May 1;88(9):3897-901.

Bursting electrical activity in pancreatic beta cells caused by Ca(2+)- and
voltage-inactivated Ca2+ channels.

Keizer J(1), Smolen P.

Author information: 
(1)Institute of Theoretical Dynamics, University of California, Davis 95616.

We investigate the hypothesis that two classes of Ca2+ currents, one quickly
inactivated by Ca2+ and one slowly inactivated by voltage, contribute to bursting
electrical activity in pancreatic islets. A mathematical model of these currents 
is fit to the experimental whole-cell current-voltage and inactivation profiles, 
thereby fixing the Ca2+ conductance and all activation and inactivation
parameters. Incorporating these currents into a model that includes delayed
rectifier K+ channels and ATP-sensitive K+ channels, we show that only abnormal
bursting is obtained. Modification of activation parameters to increase Ca2+
channel open times, as suggested by experiment, yields a more robust bursting
similar to that observed in intact islets. This reinforces the suggestion that in
addition to ATP-sensitive K+ channels, Ca2+ channels may serve as glucose sensors
in the beta cell.

PMCID: PMC51560
PMID: 1850840  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


16. Biophys J. 1961 Jul;1(6):445-66.

Impulses and Physiological States in Theoretical Models of Nerve Membrane.

Fitzhugh R.

Van der Pol's equation for a relaxation oscillator is generalized by the addition
of terms to produce a pair of non-linear differential equations with either a
stable singular point or a limit cycle. The resulting "BVP model" has two
variables of state, representing excitability and refractoriness, and
qualitatively resembles Bonhoeffer's theoretical model for the iron wire model of
nerve. This BVP model serves as a simple representative of a class of
excitable-oscillatory systems including the Hodgkin-Huxley (HH) model of the
squid giant axon. The BVP phase plane can be divided into regions corresponding
to the physiological states of nerve fiber (resting, active, refractory,
enhanced, depressed, etc.) to form a "physiological state diagram," with the help
of which many physiological phenomena can be summarized. A properly chosen
projection from the 4-dimensional HH phase space onto a plane produces a similar 
diagram which shows the underlying relationship between the two models. Impulse
trains occur in the BVP and HH models for a range of constant applied currents
which make the singular point representing the resting state unstable.

PMCID: PMC1366333
PMID: 19431309  [PubMed]


17. Biophys J. 1983 May;42(2):181-90.

Minimal model for membrane oscillations in the pancreatic beta-cell.

Chay TR, Keizer J.

Following the experimental findings of Atwater et al. (In Biochemistry Biophysics
of the Pancreatic-beta-Cell, George Thieme Verlag, New York, 100-107), we have
formulated a mathematical model for ionic and electrical events that take place
in pancreatic-beta-cells. Our formulation incorporates a Hodgkin-Huxley type
gating mechanism for Ca2+ and K+ channels, in addition to Ca2+ gated K+-channels.
Consistent with the experimental observations, our model generates spikes and
bursts in beta-cell membrane potentials and gives the correct responses to
additions of glucose, quinine, and tetraethylammonium ions. The response of the
oscillations to ouabain and changing concentrations of external K+ can be
incorporated into the present model, although a more complete treatment would
require inclusion of the Na+/K+ pump.

PMCID: PMC1329221
PMID: 6305437  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


18. Am J Physiol Endocrinol Metab. 2003 Jul;285(1):E138-54. Epub 2003 Mar 18.

Modeling of Ca2+ flux in pancreatic beta-cells: role of the plasma membrane and
intracellular stores.

Fridlyand LE(1), Tamarina N, Philipson LH.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Medicine, University of Chicago, Illinois 60637, USA.

We have developed a detailed mathematical model of ionic flux in beta-cells that 
includes the most essential channels and pumps in the plasma membrane. This model
is coupled to equations describing Ca2+, inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate (IP3), ATP,
and Na+ homeostasis, including the uptake and release of Ca2+ by the endoplasmic 
reticulum (ER). In our model, metabolically derived ATP activates inward Ca2+
flux by regulation of ATP-sensitive K+ channels and depolarization of the plasma 
membrane. Results from the simulations support the hypothesis that intracellular 
Na+ and Ca2+ in the ER can be the main variables driving both fast (2-7 osc/min) 
and slow intracellular Ca2+ concentration oscillations (0.3-0.9 osc/min) and that
the effect of IP3 on Ca2+ leak from the ER contributes to the pattern of slow
calcium oscillations. Simulations also show that filling the ER Ca2+ stores leads
to faster electrical bursting and Ca2+ oscillations. Specific Ca2+ oscillations
in isolated beta-cell lines can also be simulated.

PMID: 12644446  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


19. Vision Res. 2009 May;49(9):970-8. doi: 10.1016/j.visres.2009.03.003. Epub 2009
Mar 10.

Simulation analysis of bandpass filtering properties of a rod photoreceptor
network.

Kamiyama Y(1), Wu SM, Usui S.

Author information: 
(1)Information Science and Technology, Aichi Prefectural University, 1522-3
Ibaragabasama, Kumabari, Nagakute, Aichi, Japan. kamiyama@ist.aichi-pu.ac.jp

The bandpass filtering properties of a rod network were studied via computer
simulations. Sinusoidal current stimuli were applied to a single rod model to
characterize its temporal filtering properties. The simulated frequency response 
revealed that a single rod behaves as a bandpass filter whose characteristics are
affected by the stimulus strength and frequency. We analyzed the contribution of 
individual ionic currents to bandpass filtering and found that the filtering of
small signals is largely regulated by the calcium-dependent currents I(K(Ca)) and
I(Cl(Ca)), whereas the filtering of large signals is regulated by the
hyperpolarization-activated current, I(h). Furthermore, rod network modeling by
electrically interconnecting the single rod models revealed that the acceleration
of signals that spread laterally through the rod network is attributed to
I(K(Ca)) and not I(h).

PMID: 19281836  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


20. Science. 1977 Jul 15;197(4300):287-9.

Oscillation and chaos in physiological control systems.

Mackey MC, Glass L.

First-order nonlinear differential-delay equations describing physiological
control systems are studied. The equations display a broad diversity of dynamical
behavior including limit cycle oscillations, with a variety of wave forms, and
apparently aperiodic or "chaotic" solutions. These results are discussed in
relation to dynamical respiratory and hematopoietic diseases.

PMID: 267326  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


21. PLoS One. 2009 Jul 8;4(7):e6169. doi: 10.1371/journal.pone.0006169.

A model of postural control in quiet standing: robust compensation of
delay-induced instability using intermittent activation of feedback control.

Asai Y(1), Tasaka Y, Nomura K, Nomura T, Casadio M, Morasso P.

Author information: 
(1)The Center for Advanced Medical Engineering and Informatics, Osaka University,
Osaka, Japan.

Erratum in
    PLoS One. 2009;4(7). doi:
10.1371/annotation/96e08e7f-22f0-445d-8fb3-fe7b071d0a3a.

The main purpose of this study is to compare two different feedback controllers
for the stabilization of quiet standing in humans, taking into account that the
intrinsic ankle stiffness is insufficient and that there is a large delay
inducing instability in the feedback loop: 1) a standard linear, continuous-time 
PD controller and 2) an intermittent PD controller characterized by a switching
function defined in the phase plane, with or without a dead zone around the
nominal equilibrium state. The stability analysis of the first controller is
carried out by using the standard tools of linear control systems, whereas the
analysis of the intermittent controllers is based on the use of Poincare maps
defined in the phase plane. When the PD-control is off, the dynamics of the
system is characterized by a saddle-like equilibrium, with a stable and an
unstable manifold. The switching function of the intermittent controller is
implemented in such a way that PD-control is 'off' when the state vector is near 
the stable manifold of the saddle and is 'on' otherwise. A theoretical analysis
and a related simulation study show that the intermittent control model is much
more robust than the standard model because the size of the region in the
parameter space of the feedback control gains (P vs. D) that characterizes stable
behavior is much larger in the latter case than in the former one. Moreover, the 
intermittent controller can use feedback parameters that are much smaller than
the standard model. Typical sway patterns generated by the intermittent
controller are the result of an alternation between slow motion along the stable 
manifold of the saddle, when the PD-control is off, and spiral motion away from
the upright equilibrium determined by the activation of the PD-control with low
feedback gains. Remarkably, overall dynamic stability can be achieved by
combining in a smart way two unstable regimes: a saddle and an unstable spiral.
The intermittent controller exploits the stabilizing effect of one part of the
saddle, letting the system evolve by alone when it slides on or near the stable
manifold; when the state vector enters the strongly unstable part of the saddle
it switches on a mild feedback which is not supposed to impose a strict stable
regime but rather to mitigate the impending fall. The presence of a dead zone in 
the intermittent controller does not alter the stability properties but improves 
the similarity with biological sway patterns. The two types of controllers are
also compared in the frequency domain by considering the power spectral density
(PSD) of the sway sequences generated by the models with additive noise.
Different from the standard continuous model, whose PSD function is similar to an
over-damped second order system without a resonance, the intermittent control
model is capable to exhibit the two power law scaling regimes that are typical of
physiological sway movements in humans.

PMCID: PMC2704954
PMID: 19584944  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


22. Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A. 2004 Feb 17;101(7):1822-7. Epub 2004 Feb 6.

Detection of multistability, bifurcations, and hysteresis in a large class of
biological positive-feedback systems.

Angeli D(1), Ferrell JE Jr, Sontag ED.

Author information: 
(1)Dipartimento di Sistemi e Informatica, University of Florence, 50139 Florence,
Italy.

It is becoming increasingly clear that bistability (or, more generally,
multistability) is an important recurring theme in cell signaling. Bistability
may be of particular relevance to biological systems that switch between discrete
states, generate oscillatory responses, or "remember" transitory stimuli.
Standard mathematical methods allow the detection of bistability in some very
simple feedback systems (systems with one or two proteins or genes that either
activate each other or inhibit each other), but realistic depictions of signal
transduction networks are invariably much more complex. Here, we show that for a 
class of feedback systems of arbitrary order the stability properties of the
system can be deduced mathematically from how the system behaves when feedback is
blocked. Provided that this open-loop, feedback-blocked system is monotone and
possesses a sigmoidal characteristic, the system is guaranteed to be bistable for
some range of feedback strengths. We present a simple graphical method for
deducing the stability behavior and bifurcation diagrams for such systems and
illustrate the method with two examples taken from recent experimental studies of
bistable systems: a two-variable Cdc2/Wee1 system and a more complicated
five-variable mitogen-activated protein kinase cascade.

PMCID: PMC357011
PMID: 14766974  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


23. Curr Biol. 2003 Aug 19;13(16):1398-408.

Autoinhibition with transcriptional delay: a simple mechanism for the zebrafish
somitogenesis oscillator.

Lewis J(1).

Author information: 
(1)Vertebrate Development Laboratory, Cancer Research UK London Research
Institute, 44 Lincoln's Inn Fields, London WC2A 3PX, United Kingdom.
julian.lewis@cancer.org.uk

BACKGROUND: The pattern of somites is traced out by a mechanism involving
oscillating gene expression at the tail end of the embryo. In zebrafish, two
linked oscillating genes, her1 and her7, coding for inhibitory gene regulatory
proteins, are especially implicated in genesis of the oscillations, while Notch
signaling appears necessary for synchronization of adjacent cells.
RESULTS: I show by mathematical simulation that direct autorepression of her1 and
her7 by their own protein products provides a mechanism for the intracellular
oscillator. This mechanism operates robustly even when one allows for the fact
that gene regulation is an essentially noisy (stochastic) process. The predicted 
period is close to the observed period (30 min) and is dictated primarily by the 
transcriptional delay, the time taken to make an mRNA molecule. Through its
coupling to her1/her7 expression, Notch signaling can keep the rapid oscillations
in adjacent cells synchronized. When the coupling parameters are varied, however,
the model system can switch to oscillations of a much longer period, resembling
that of the mouse or chick somitogenesis oscillator and governed by the delays in
the Notch pathway. Such Notch-mediated synchronous oscillations are predicted
even in the absence of direct her1/her7 autoregulation, through operation of the 
standard Notch signaling pathway that is usually assumed simply to give lateral
inhibition.
CONCLUSIONS: Direct autorepression of a gene by its own product can generate
oscillations, with a period determined by the transcriptional and translational
delays. Simple as they are, such systems show surprising behaviors. To understand
them, unaided intuition is not enough: we need mathematics.

PMID: 12932323  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


24. Chaos. 2011 Jun;21(2):023121. doi: 10.1063/1.3597645.

Reentrant excitation in an analog-digital hybrid circuit model of cardiac tissue.

Mahmud F(1), Shiozawa N, Makikawa M, Nomura T.

Author information: 
(1)Graduate School of Engineering Science, Osaka University, Osaka 5608534,
Japan.

We propose an analog-digital hybrid circuit model of one-dimensional cardiac
tissue with hardware implementation that allows us to perform real-time
simulations of spatially conducting cardiac action potentials. Each active nodal 
compartment of the tissue model is designed using analog circuits and a dsPIC
microcontroller, by which the time-dependent and time-independent nonlinear
current-voltage relationships of six types of ion channel currents employed in
the Luo-Rudy phase I (LR-I) model for a single mammalian cardiac ventricular cell
can be reproduced quantitatively. Here, we perform real-time simulations of
reentrant excitation conduction in a ring-shaped tissue model that includes
eighty nodal compartments. In particular, we show that the hybrid tissue model
can exhibit real-time dynamics for initiation of reentries induced by
uni-directional block, as well as those for phase resetting that leads to
annihilation of the reentry in response to impulsive current stimulations at
appropriate nodes and timings. The dynamics of the hybrid model are comparable to
those of a spatially distributed tissue model with LR-I compartments. Thus, it is
conceivable that the hybrid model might be a useful tool for large scale
simulations of cardiac tissue dynamics, as an alternative to numerical
simulations, leading toward further understanding of the reentrant mechanisms.

PMID: 21721763  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


25. J Neurophysiol. 1997 Dec;78(6):3371-85.

Compartmental model of vertebrate motoneurons for Ca2+-dependent spiking and
plateau potentials under pharmacological treatment.

Booth V(1), Rinzel J, Kiehn O.

Author information: 
(1)Mathematical Research Branch, National Institute of Diabetes and Digestive and
Kidney Diseases, National Institutes of Health 9190, Bethesda, Maryland 20814,
USA.

In contrast to the limited response properties observed under normal experimental
conditions, spinal motoneurons generate complex firing patterns, such as
Ca2+-dependent regenerative spiking and plateaus, in the presence of certain
neurotransmitters and ion-channel blockers. We have developed a quantitative
motoneuron model, based on turtle motoneuron data, toinvestigate the roles of
specific ionic currents and the effects of their soma and dendritic distribution 
in generating these complex firing patterns. In addition, the model is used to
explore the effects of multiple ion channel blockers and neurotransmitters that
are known to modulate motoneuron firing patterns. To represent the distribution
of ionic currents across the soma and dendrites, the model contains two
compartments. The soma compartment, representing the soma and proximal dendrites,
contains Hodgkin-Huxley-like sodium (INa) and delayed rectifier K+ (IK-dr)
currents, an N-like Ca2+ current (ICa-N), and a calcium-dependent K+ current
[IK(Ca)]. The dendritic compartment, representing the lumped distal dendrites,
contains, in addition to ICa-N and IK(Ca) as in the soma, a persistent L-like
calcium current (ICa-L). We determined kinetic parameters for INa, IK-dr, ICa-N, 
and IK(Ca) in order to reproduce normal action-potential firing observed in
turtle spinal motoneurons, including fast and slow afterhyperpolarizations (AHPs)
and a linear steady-state frequency-current relation. With this parameter set as 
default, a sequence of pharmacological manipulations were systematically
simulated. A small reduction of IK-dr [mimicking the experimental effect of
tetraethylammonium (TEA) in low concentration] enhanced the slow AHP and caused
calcium spiking (mediated by ICa-N) when INa was blocked. Firing patterns
observed experimentally in high TEA [and tetrodotoxin (TTX)], namely calcium
spikes riding on a calcium plateau, were reproduced only when both IK-dr and
IK(Ca) were reduced. Dendritic plateau potentials, mediated by ICa-L, were
reliably unmasked when IK(Ca) was reduced, mimicking the experimental effect of
the bee venom apamin. The effect of 5-HT, which experimentally induces the
ability to generate calcium-dependent plateau potentials but not calcium spiking,
was reproduced in the model by reducing IK(Ca) alone. The plateau threshold
current level, however, was reduced substantially if a simultaneous increase in
ICa-L was simulated, suggesting that serotonin (5-HT) induces plateau potentials 
by regulating more than one conductance. The onset of the plateau potential
showed significant delays in response to near-threshold, depolarizing current
steps. In addition, the delay times were sensitive to the current step amplitude.
The delay and its sensitivity were explained by examining the model's behavior
near the threshold for plateau onset. This modeling study thus accurately
accounts for the basic firing behavior of vertebrate motoneurons as well as a
range of complex firing patterns invoked by ion-channel blockers and 5-HT. In
addition, our computational results support the hypothesis that the
electroresponsiveness of motoneurons depends on a nonuniform distribution of
ionic conductances, and they predict modulatory effects of 5-HT and properties of
plateau activation that have yet to be tested experimentally.

PMID: 9405551  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


26. Philos Trans R Soc Lond B Biol Sci. 1985 Jan 10;307(1133):353-98.

A model of cardiac electrical activity incorporating ionic pumps and
concentration changes.

DiFrancesco D, Noble D.

PMID: 2578676  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


27. Biophys J. 1976 Mar;16(3):227-44.

Mathematical description of a bursting pacemaker neuron by a modification of the 
Hodgkin-Huxley equations.

Plant RE, Kim M.

Modifications based on experimental results reported in the literature are made
to the Hodgkin-Huxley equations to describe the electrophysiological behavior of 
the Aplysia abdominal ganglion R15 cell. The system is then further modified to
describe the effects with the application of the drug tetrodotoxin (TTX) to the
cells' bathing medium. Methods of the qualitative theory of differential
equations are used to determine the conditions necessary for such a system of
equations to have an oscillatory solution. A model satisfying these conditions is
shown to preduct many experimental observations of R15 cell behavior. Numerical
solutions are obtained for differential equations satisfying the conditions of
the model. These solutions are shown to have a form similar to that of the
bursting which is characteristic of this cell, and to preduct many results of
experiments conducted on this cell. The physiological implications of the model
are discussed.

PMCID: PMC1334834
PMID: 1252578  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


28. Biol Cybern. 1985;52(6):367-76.

Sustained oscillations generated by mutually inhibiting neurons with adaptation.

Matsuoka K.

Autonomic oscillatory activities exist in almost every living thing and most of
them are produced by rhythmic activities of the corresponding neural systems
(locomotion, respiration, heart beat, etc.). This paper mathematically discusses 
sustained oscillations generated by mutual inhibition of the neurons which are
represented by a continuous-variable model with a kind of fatigue or adaptation
effect. If the neural network has no stable stationary state for constant input
stimuli, it will generate and sustain some oscillation for any initial state and 
for any disturbance. Some sufficient conditions for that are given to three types
of neural networks: lateral inhibition networks of linearly arrayed neurons,
symmetric inhibition networks and cyclic inhibition networks. The result suggests
that the adaptation of the neurons plays a very important role for the appearance
of the oscillations. Some computer simulations of rhythmic activities are also
presented for cyclic inhibition networks consisting of a few neurons.

PMID: 2996634  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


29. Biol Cybern. 1994;71(4):281-91.

Analysis of bursting in a thalamic neuron model.

Rush ME(1), Rinzel J.

Author information: 
(1)Mathematical Research Branch, NIDDK, National Institutes of Health, Bethesda, 
MD 20892.

We extend a quantitative model for low-voltage, slow-wave excitability based on
the T-type calcium current (Wang et al. 1991) by juxtaposing it with a
Hodgkin-Huxley-like model for fast sodium spiking in the high voltage regime to
account for the distinct firing modes of thalamic neurons. We employ bifurcation 
analysis to illustrate the stimulus-response behavior of the full model under
both voltage regimes. The model neuron shows continuous sodium spiking when
depolarized sufficiently from rest. Depending on the parameters of calcium
current inactivation, there are two types of low-voltage responses to a
hyperpolarizing current step: a single rebound low threshold spike (LTS) upon
release of the step and periodic LTSs. Bursting is seen as sodium spikes ride the
LTS crest. In both cases, we analyze the LTS burst response by projecting its
trajectory into a fast/slow phase plane. We also use phase plane methods to show 
that a potassium A-current shifts the threshold for sodium spikes, reducing the
number of fast sodium spikes in an LTS burst. It can also annihilate periodic
bursting. We extend the previous work of Rose and Hindmarsh (1989a-c) for a
thalamic neuron and propose a simpler model for thalamic activity. We consider
burst modulation by using a neuromodulator-dependent potassium leakage
conductance as a control parameter. These results correspond with experiments
showing that the application of certain neurotransmitters can switch firing
modes.

PMID: 7948220  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


30. J Comput Neurosci. 2005 Jun;18(3):255-63.

Coexistence of tonic spiking oscillations in a leech neuron model.

Cymbalyuk G(1), Shilnikov A.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Physics and Astronomy, Georgia State University, Atlanta, GA
30303, USA. gcym@phy-astr.gsu.edu

The leech neuron model studied here has a remarkable dynamical plasticity. It
exhibits a wide range of activities including various types of tonic spiking and 
bursting. In this study we apply methods of the qualitative theory of dynamical
systems and the bifurcation theory to analyze the dynamics of the leech neuron
model with emphasis on tonic spiking regimes. We show that the model can
demonstrate bi-stability, such that two modes of tonic spiking coexist. Under a
certain parameter regime, both tonic spiking modes are represented by the
periodic attractors. As a bifurcation parameter is varied, one of the attractors 
becomes chaotic through a cascade of period-doubling bifurcations, while the
other remains periodic. Thus, the system can demonstrate co-existence of a
periodic tonic spiking with either periodic or chaotic tonic spiking.
Pontryagin's averaging technique is used to locate the periodic orbits in the
phase space.

PMID: 15830162  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


31. Comput Biomed Res. 1984 Dec;17(6):570-9.

A mathematical insulin-secretion model and its validation in isolated rat
pancreatic islets perifusion.

Nomura M, Shichiri M, Kawamori R, Yamasaki Y, Iwama N, Abe H.

A mathematical insulin-secretion model was constructed by analyzing the
glucose-induced insulin secretion using a control theory. To validate the model, 
experimental data obtained in the isolated rat pancreatic islet perifusion system
were compared with the simulation results. The simulation study of the model was 
found to fit quite well to insulin responses under various experimental
conditions. A glucose-induced insulin secretion from pancreatic islets' beta cell
was found to be expressed as a function of proportional plus derivative response 
to glucose input with the first order time lag. And the negative rate of change
in glucose concentration was found to suppress insulin secretion to the extent of
the negative stimuli, regardless of glucose concentration. This model would be
useful as a research tool for analysis of physiological significance of insulin
secretory dynamics and clinical investigation of insulin secretion.

PMID: 6391804  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


32. Prog Biophys Mol Biol. 2008 Sep;98(1):52-60. doi:
10.1016/j.pbiomolbio.2008.05.003. Epub 2008 May 29.

In silico risk assessment for drug-induction of cardiac arrhythmia.

Suzuki S(1), Murakami S, Tsujimae K, Findlay I, Kurachi Y.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Pharmacology, Graduate School of Medicine, Osaka University,
Suita, Osaka, Japan.

The main components of repolarization reserve for the ventricular action
potential (AP) are the rapid (I(Kr)) and slow (I(Ks)) delayed outward K(+)
currents. While many drugs block I(Kr) and cause life-threatening arrhythmias
including torsades de pointes, the frequency of arrhythmias varies between
different I(Kr)-blockers. Different types of block of I(Kr) cause distinct
phenotypes of prolongation of action potential duration (APD), increase in
transmural dispersion of repolarization (TDR) and, accordingly, occurrence of
torsades de pointes. Therefore the assessment of a drug's proarrhythmic risk
requires a method that provides quantitative and comprehensive comparison of the 
effects of different forms of I(Kr)-blockade upon APDs and TDR. However, most
currently available methods are not adapted to such an extensive comparison.
Here, we introduce I(Kr)-I(Ks) two-dimensional maps of APD and TDR as a novel
risk-assessment method. Taking the kinetics of I(Kr)-blockade into account, APDs 
can be calculated upon a ventricular AP model which systematically alters the
magnitudes of I(Kr) and I(Ks). The calculated APDs are then plotted on a map
where the x axis represents the conductance of I(Kr) while the y axis represents 
that of I(Ks). TDR is simulated with models corresponding to APs in epicardial,
midcardial and endocardial myocardium. These two-dimensional maps of APD and TDR 
successfully account for differences in the risk resulting from three distinct
types of I(Kr)-blockade which correspond to the effects of dofetilide, quinidine 
and vesnarinone. This method may be of use to assess the arrhythmogenic risk of
various I(Kr)-blockers.

PMID: 18635251  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


33. Circ J. 2011;75(1):80-8. Epub 2010 Nov 16.

Transmural dispersion of repolarization determines scroll wave behavior during
ventricular tachyarrhythmias.

Haraguchi R(1), Ashihara T, Namba T, Tsumoto K, Murakami S, Kurachi Y, Ikeda T,
Nakazawa K.

Author information: 
(1)National Cerebral and Cardiovascular Center Research Institute, Suita, Japan. 
haraguch@ri.ncvc.go.jp

Comment in
    Circ J. 2011;75(1):49-50.

BACKGROUND: Ventricular tachyarrhythmia is the leading cause of sudden cardiac
death, and scroll wave re-entry is known to underlie this condition. Class III
antiarrhythmic drugs are commonly used worldwide to treat ventricular
tachyarrhythmias; however, these drugs have a proarrhythmic adverse effect and
can cause Torsade de Pointes or ventricular fibrillation. Transmural dispersion
of repolarization (TDR) has been suggested to be a strong indicator of
ventricular tachyarrhythmia induction. However, the role of TDR during sustained 
scroll wave re-entry is poorly understood. The purpose of the present study was
to investigate how TDR affects scroll wave behavior and to provide a novel
analysis of the mechanisms that sustain tachyarrhythmias, using computer
simulations.
METHODS AND RESULTS: Computer simulations were carried out to quantify the TDR
and QT interval under a variety of I(Ks) and I(Kr) during transmural conduction. 
Simulated scroll wave re-entries were done under a variety of I(Ks) and I(Kr) in 
a ventricular wall slab model, and the scroll wave behavior and the filament
dynamics (3-dimensional organizing center) were analyzed. A slight increase in
TDR, but not in the QT interval, reflected antiarrhythmic properties resulting
from the restraint of scroll wave breakup, whereas a marked increase in TDR was
proarrhythmic, as a result of scroll wave breakup.
CONCLUSIONS: The TDR determines the sustainment of ventricular tachyarrhythmias, 
through control of the scroll wave filament dynamics.

PMID: 21099125  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


34. J Neurosci. 2002 Apr 1;22(7):2963-76.

Activity patterns in a model for the subthalamopallidal network of the basal
ganglia.

Terman D(1), Rubin JE, Yew AC, Wilson CJ.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Mathematics, The Ohio State University, Columbus, Ohio 43210,
USA. terman@math.ohio-state.edu

Based on recent experimental data, we have developed a conductance-based
computational network model of the subthalamic nucleus and the external segment
of the globus pallidus in the indirect pathway of the basal ganglia. Computer
simulations and analysis of this model illuminate the roles of the coupling
architecture of the network, and associated synaptic conductances, in modulating 
the activity patterns displayed by this network. Depending on the relationships
of these coupling parameters, the network can support three general classes of
sustained firing patterns: clustering, propagating waves, and repetitive spiking 
that may show little regularity or correlation. Each activity pattern can occur
continuously or in discrete episodes. We characterize the mechanisms underlying
these rhythms, as well as the influence of parameters on details such as spiking 
frequency and wave speed. These results suggest that the subthalamopallidal
circuit is capable both of correlated rhythmic activity and of irregular
autonomous patterns of activity that block rhythmicity. Increased striatal input 
to, and weakened intrapallidal inhibition within, the indirect pathway can switch
the behavior of the circuit from irregular to rhythmic. This may be sufficient to
explain the emergence of correlated oscillatory activity in the
subthalamopallidal circuit after destruction of dopaminergic neurons in
Parkinson's disease and in animal models of parkinsonism.

PMID: 11923461  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


35. Biol Cybern. 1991;65(3):147-59.

Self-organized control of bipedal locomotion by neural oscillators in
unpredictable environment.

Taga G(1), Yamaguchi Y, Shimizu H.

Author information: 
(1)Faculty of Pharmaceutical Sciences, University of Tokyo, Japan.

A new principle of sensorimotor control of legged locomotion in an unpredictable 
environment is proposed on the basis of neurophysiological knowledge and a theory
of nonlinear dynamics. Stable and flexible locomotion is realized as a global
limit cycle generated by a global entrainment between the rhythmic activities of 
a nervous system composed of coupled neural oscillators and the rhythmic
movements of a musculo-skeletal system including interaction with its
environment. Coordinated movements are generated not by slaving to an explicit
representation of the precise trajectories of the movement of each part but by
dynamic interactions among the nervous system, the musculo-skeletal system and
the environment. The performance of a bipedal model based on the above principle 
was investigated by computer simulation. Walking movements stable to mechanical
perturbations and to environmental changes were obtained. Moreover, the model
generated not only the walking movement but also the running movement by changing
a single parameter nonspecific to the movement. The transitions between the gait 
patterns occurred with hysteresis.

PMID: 1912008  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


36. PLoS One. 2007 Oct 3;2(10):e983.

Investigating the role of islet cytoarchitecture in its oscillation using a new
beta-cell cluster model.

Nittala A(1), Ghosh S, Wang X.

Author information: 
(1)Max McGee National Research Center for Juvenile Diabetes, Medical College of
Wisconsin, Milwaukee, Wisconsin, United States of America.

The oscillatory insulin release is fundamental to normal glycemic control. The
basis of the oscillation is the intercellular coupling and bursting
synchronization of beta cells in each islet. The functional role of islet beta
cell mass organization with respect to its oscillatory bursting is not well
understood. This is of special interest in view of the recent finding of islet
cytoarchitectural differences between human and animal models. In this study we
developed a new hexagonal closest packing (HCP) cell cluster model. The model
captures more accurately the real islet cell organization than the simple cubic
packing (SCP) cluster that is conventionally used. Using our new model we
investigated the functional characteristics of beta-cell clusters, including the 
fraction of cells able to burst f(b), the synchronization index lambda of the
bursting beta cells, the bursting period T(b), the plateau fraction p(f), and the
amplitude of intracellular calcium oscillation [Ca]. We determined their
dependence on cluster architectural parameters including number of cells n(beta),
number of inter-beta cell couplings of each beta cell n(c), and the coupling
strength g(c). We found that at low values of n(beta), n(c) and g(c), the
oscillation regularity improves with their increasing values. This functional
gain plateaus around their physiological values in real islets, at n(beta)
approximately 100, n(c) approximately 6 and g(c) approximately 200 pS. In
addition, normal beta-cell clusters are robust against significant perturbation
to their architecture, including the presence of non-beta cells or dead beta
cells. In clusters with n(beta)> approximately 100, coordinated beta-cell
bursting can be maintained at up to 70% of beta-cell loss, which is consistent
with laboratory and clinical findings of islets. Our results suggest that the
bursting characteristics of a beta-cell cluster depend quantitatively on its
architecture in a non-linear fashion. These findings are important to understand 
the islet bursting phenomenon and the regulation of insulin secretion, under both
physiological and pathological conditions.

PMCID: PMC1991600
PMID: 17912360  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


37. Phys Rev Lett. 2005 Feb 4;94(4):048101. Epub 2005 Jan 31.

Transition between tonic spiking and bursting in a neuron model via the blue-sky 
catastrophe.

Shilnikov A(1), Cymbalyuk G.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Mathematics and Statistics, Georgia State University, Atlanta,
Georgia 30303, USA.

We study a continuous and reversible transition between periodic tonic spiking
and bursting activities in a neuron model. It is described as the blue-sky
catastrophe, which is a homoclinic bifurcation of a saddle-node periodic orbit of
codimension one. This transition constitutes a biophysically plausible mechanism 
for the regulation of burst duration that increases with no bound like 1/square
root alpha-alpha0 as the transition value alpha0 is approached.

PMID: 15783604  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


38. Biophys J. 1981 Jul;35(1):193-213.

Voltage oscillations in the barnacle giant muscle fiber.

Morris C, Lecar H.

Barnacle muscle fibers subjected to constant current stimulation produce a
variety of types of oscillatory behavior when the internal medium contains the
Ca++ chelator EGTA. Oscillations are abolished if Ca++ is removed from the
external medium, or if the K+ conductance is blocked. Available voltage-clamp
data indicate that the cell's active conductance systems are exceptionally
simple. Given the complexity of barnacle fiber voltage behavior, this seems
paradoxical. This paper presents an analysis of the possible modes of behavior
available to a system of two noninactivating conductance mechanisms, and
indicates a good correspondence to the types of behavior exhibited by barnacle
fiber. The differential equations of a simple equivalent circuit for the fiber
are dealt with by means of some of the mathematical techniques of nonlinear
mechanics. General features of the system are (a) a propensity to produce damped 
or sustained oscillations over a rather broad parameter range, and (b)
considerable latitude in the shape of the oscillatory potentials. It is concluded
that for cells subject to changeable parameters (either from cell to cell or with
time during cellular activity), a system dominated by two noninactivating
conductances can exhibit varied oscillatory and bistable behavior.

PMCID: PMC1327511
PMID: 7260316  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


39. Biophys J. 1986 Nov;50(5):765-77.

On the effect of the intracellular calcium-sensitive K+ channel in the bursting
pancreatic beta-cell.

Chay TR.

Based on the observation that the calcium-activated K+ channel in the pancreatic 
islet cells can also be activated by the membrane potential, we have formulated a
mathematical model for the electrical activity in the pancreatic beta-cell. Our
model contains two types of ionic channels, which are active above the
subthreshold glucose concentration in the limit-cycle region: a Ca2+-activated,
voltage-gated K+ channel and voltage-gated Ca2+ channel. Numerical simulation of 
the model generates bursts of electrical activity in response to a variation of
kCa, the rate constant for sequestration of intracellular calcium ions. The
period and duration of the bursts in response to kCa are in good agreement with
experiment. The model predicts that a combined spike and burst pattern can be
created using only single species of inward and outward currents, the
inactivation kinetics (i.e., h) in the inward current is not a necessary
condition for the generation of the pattern, and a given pattern or intensity of 
electrical activity may produce different levels of intracellular Ca2+ depending 
on the set of certain electrical parameters.

PMCID: PMC1329801
PMID: 2431725  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


40. J Comput Neurosci. 2004 May-Jun;16(3):211-35.

High frequency stimulation of the subthalamic nucleus eliminates pathological
thalamic rhythmicity in a computational model.

Rubin JE(1), Terman D.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Mathematics and Center for the Neural Basis of Cognition,
University of Pittsburgh, Pittsburgh, PA 15260, USA.

Deep brain stimulation (DBS) of the subthalamic nucleus (STN) or the internal
segment of the globus pallidus (GPi) has recently been recognized as an important
form of intervention for alleviating motor symptoms associated with Parkinson's
disease, but the mechanism underlying its effectiveness remains unknown. Using a 
computational model, this paper considers the hypothesis that DBS works by
replacing pathologically rhythmic basal ganglia output with tonic, high frequency
firing. In our simulations of parkinsonian conditions, rhythmic inhibition from
GPi to the thalamus compromises the ability of thalamocortical relay (TC) cells
to respond to depolarizing inputs, such as sensorimotor signals. High frequency
stimulation of STN regularizes GPi firing, and this restores TC responsiveness,
despite the increased frequency and amplitude of GPi inhibition to thalamus that 
result. We provide a mathematical phase plane analysis of the mechanisms that
determine TC relay capabilities in normal, parkinsonian, and DBS states in a
reduced model. This analysis highlights the differences in deinactivation of the 
low-threshold calcium T -current that we observe in TC cells in these different
conditions. Alternative scenarios involving convergence of thalamic signals in
the cortex are also discussed, and predictions associated with these results,
including the occurrence of rhythmic rebound bursts in certain TC cells in
parkinsonian states and their drastic reduction by DBS, are stated. These results
demonstrate how DBS could work by increasing firing rates of target cells, rather
than shutting them down.

Copyright 2004 Kluwer Academic Publishers

PMID: 15114047  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


41. Eur J Neurosci. 2012 Jul;36(2):2229-39. doi: 10.1111/j.1460-9568.2012.08105.x.

Improved conditions for the generation of beta oscillations in the subthalamic
nucleus--globus pallidus network.

Pavlides A(1), Hogan SJ, Bogacz R.

Author information: 
(1)Bristol Centre for Complexity Sciences, Department of Computer Science,
University of Bristol, Bristol BS8 1UB, UK. a.pavlides@bristol.ac.uk

A key pathology in the development of Parkinson's disease is the occurrence of
persistent beta oscillations, which are correlated with difficulty in movement
initiation. We investigated the network model composed of the subthalamic nucleus
(STN) and globus pallidus (GP) developed by A. Nevado Holgado et al. [(2010)
Journal of Neuroscience, 30, 12340-12352], who identified the conditions under
which this circuit could generate beta oscillations. Our work extended their
analysis by deriving improved analytic stability conditions for realistic values 
of the synaptic transmission delay between STN and GP neurons. The improved
conditions were significantly closer to the results of simulations for the range 
of synaptic transmission delays measured experimentally. Furthermore, our
analysis explained how changes in cortical and striatal input to the STN-GP
network influenced oscillations generated by the circuit. As we have identified
when a system of mutually connected populations of excitatory and inhibitory
neurons can generate oscillations, our results may also find applications in the 
study of neural oscillations produced by assemblies of excitatory and inhibitory 
neurons in other brain regions.

c 2012 The Authors. European Journal of Neuroscience c 2012 Federation of
European Neuroscience Societies and Blackwell Publishing Ltd.

PMID: 22805067  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


42. Phys Rev Lett. 2008 Aug 8;101(6):068103. Epub 2008 Aug 8.

New dynamics in cerebellar Purkinje cells: torus canards.

Kramer MA(1), Traub RD, Kopell NJ.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Mathematics and Statistics, Boston University, Boston,
Massachusetts 02215, USA.

We describe a transition from bursting to rapid spiking in a reduced mathematical
model of a cerebellar Purkinje cell. We perform a slow-fast analysis of the
system and find that-after a saddle node bifurcation of limit cycles-the full
model dynamics temporarily follow a repelling branch of limit cycles. We propose 
that the system exhibits a dynamical phenomenon new to realistic, biophysical
applications: torus canards.

PMCID: PMC2662447
PMID: 18764509  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


43. IEEE Trans Neural Netw. 2003;14(6):1569-72. doi: 10.1109/TNN.2003.820440.

Simple model of spiking neurons.

Izhikevich EM(1).

Author information: 
(1)The Neurosciences Inst., San Diego, CA, USA.

A model is presented that reproduces spiking and bursting behavior of known types
of cortical neurons. The model combines the biologically plausibility of
Hodgkin-Huxley-type dynamics and the computational efficiency of
integrate-and-fire neurons. Using this model, one can simulate tens of thousands 
of spiking cortical neurons in real time (1 ms resolution) using a desktop PC.

PMID: 18244602  [PubMed]


44. J Neurophysiol. 1999 Jul;82(1):382-97.

Models of respiratory rhythm generation in the pre-Botzinger complex. I. Bursting
pacemaker neurons.

Butera RJ Jr(1), Rinzel J, Smith JC.

Author information: 
(1)Cellular and Systems Neurobiology Section, Laboratory of Neural Control,
National Institute of Neurological Disorders and Stroke, National Institutes of
Health, Bethesda, Maryland 20892-4455, USA.

A network of oscillatory bursting neurons with excitatory coupling is
hypothesized to define the primary kernel for respiratory rhythm generation in
the pre-Botzinger complex (pre-BotC) in mammals. Two minimal models of these
neurons are proposed. In model 1, bursting arises via fast activation and slow
inactivation of a persistent Na+ current INaP-h. In model 2, bursting arises via 
a fast-activating persistent Na+ current INaP and slow activation of a K+ current
IKS. In both models, action potentials are generated via fast Na+ and K+
currents. The two models have few differences in parameters to facilitate a
rigorous comparison of the two different burst-generating mechanisms. Both models
are consistent with many of the dynamic features of electrophysiological
recordings from pre-BotC oscillatory bursting neurons in vitro, including
voltage-dependent activity modes (silence, bursting, and beating), a
voltage-dependent burst frequency that can vary from 0.05 to >1 Hz, and a
decaying spike frequency during bursting. These results are robust and persist
across a wide range of parameter values for both models. However, the dynamics of
model 1 are more consistent with experimental data in that the burst duration
decreases as the baseline membrane potential is depolarized and the model has a
relatively flat membrane potential trajectory during the interburst interval. We 
propose several experimental tests to demonstrate the validity of either model
and to differentiate between the two mechanisms.

PMID: 10400966  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


45. J Neurophysiol. 1991 Aug;66(2):635-50.

A model of a CA3 hippocampal pyramidal neuron incorporating voltage-clamp data on
intrinsic conductances.

Traub RD(1), Wong RK, Miles R, Michelson H.

Author information: 
(1)IBM Research Division, IBM T. J. Watson Research Center, Yorktown Heights
10598.

1. We have developed a 19-compartment cable model of a guinea pig CA3 pyramidal
neuron. Each compartment is allowed to contain six active ionic conductances:
gNa, gCa, gK(DR) (where DR stands for delayed rectifier), gK(A), gK(AHP), and
gK(C). THe conductance gCa is of the high-voltage activated type. The model
kinetics for the first five of these conductances incorporate voltage-clamp data 
obtained from isolated hippocampal pyramidal neurons. The kinetics of gK(C) are
based on data from bullfrog sympathetic neurons. The time constant for decay of
submembrane calcium derives from optical imaging of Ca signals in Purkinje cell
dendrites. 2. To construct the model from available voltage-clamp data, we first 
reproduced current-clamp records from a model isolated neuron (soma plus proximal
dendrites). We next assumed that ionic channel kinetics in the dendrites were the
same as in the soma. In accord with dendritic recordings and calcium-imaging
data, we also assumed that significant gCa occurs in dendrites. We then attached 
sections of basilar and apical dendritic cable. By trial and error, we found a
distribution (not necessarily unique) of ionic conductance densities that was
consistent with current-clamp records from the soma and dendrites of whole
neurons and from isolated apical dendrites. 3. The resulting model reproduces the
Ca(2+)-dependent spike depolarizing afterpotential (DAP) recorded after a
stimulus subthreshold for burst elicitation. 4. The model also reproduces the
behavior of CA3 pyramidal neurons injected with increasing somatic depolarizing
currents: low-frequency (0.3-1.0 Hz) rhythmic bursting for small currents, with
burst frequency increasing with current magnitude; then more irregular bursts
followed by afterhyperpolarizations (AHPs) interspersed with brief bursts without
AHPs; and finally, rhythmic action potentials without bursts. 5. The model
predicts the existence of still another firing pattern during tonic depolarizing 
dendritic stimulation: brief bursts at less than 1 to approximately 12 Hz, a
pattern not observed during somatic stimulation. These bursts correspond to
rhythmic dendritic calcium spikes. 6. The model CA3 pyramidal neuron can be made 
to resemble functionally a CA1 pyramidal neuron by increasing gK(DR) and
decreasing dendritic gCa and gK(C). Specifically, after these alterations, tonic 
depolarization of the soma leads to adapting repetitive firing, whereas
stimulation of the distal dendrites leads to bursting. 7. A critical set of
parameters concerns the regulation of the pool of intracellular [Ca2+] that
interacts with membrane channels (gK(C) and gK(AHP)), particularly in the
dendrites.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 400 WORDS)

PMID: 1663538  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


46. J Neurophysiol. 1999 Aug;82(2):804-17.

Electrophysiological properties of inferior olive neurons: A compartmental model.

Schweighofer N(1), Doya K, Kawato M.

Author information: 
(1)ERATO, Kawato Dynamic Brain Project, Japan Science and Technology Corporation,
Kyoto 619-0288 Japan.

As a step in exploring the functions of the inferior olive, we constructed a
biophysical model of the olivary neurons to examine their unique
electrophysiological properties. The model consists of two compartments to
represent the known distribution of ionic currents across the cell membrane, as
well as the dendritic location of the gap junctions and synaptic inputs. The
somatic compartment includes a low-threshold calcium current (I(Ca_l)), an
anomalous inward rectifier current (I(h)), a sodium current (I(Na)), and a
delayed rectifier potassium current (I(K_dr)). The dendritic compartment contains
a high-threshold calcium current (I(Ca_h)), a calcium-dependent potassium current
(I(K_Ca)), and a current flowing into other cells through electrical coupling
(I(c)). First, kinetic parameters for these currents were set according to
previously reported experimental data. Next, the remaining free parameters were
determined to account for both static and spiking properties of single olivary
neurons in vitro. We then performed a series of simulated pharmacological
experiments using bifurcation analysis and extensive two-parameter searches.
Consistent with previous studies, we quantitatively demonstrated the major role
of I(Ca_l) in spiking excitability. In addition, I(h) had an important modulatory
role in the spike generation and period of oscillations, as previously suggested 
by Bal and McCormick. Finally, we investigated the role of electrical coupling in
two coupled spiking cells. Depending on the coupling strength, the
hyperpolarization level, and the I(Ca_l) and I(h) modulation, the coupled cells
had four different synchronization modes: the cells could be in-phase,
phase-shifted, or anti-phase or could exhibit a complex desynchronized spiking
mode. Hence these simulation results support the counterintuitive hypothesis that
electrical coupling can desynchronize coupled inferior olive cells.

PMID: 10444678  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


47. Biophys J. 2011 Feb 2;100(3):554-63. doi: 10.1016/j.bpj.2010.12.3716.

Roles of subcellular Na+ channel distributions in the mechanism of cardiac
conduction.

Tsumoto K(1), Ashihara T, Haraguchi R, Nakazawa K, Kurachi Y.

Author information: 
(1)The Center for Advanced Medical Engineering and Informatics, Osaka University,
Osaka, Japan.

The gap junction and voltage-gated Na(+) channel play an important role in the
action potential propagation. The purpose of this study was to elucidate the
roles of subcellular Na(+) channel distribution in action potential propagation. 
To achieve this, we constructed the myocardial strand model, which can calculate 
the current via intercellular cleft (electric-field mechanism) together with
gap-junctional current (gap-junctional mechanism). We conducted simulations of
action potential propagation in a myofiber model where cardiomyocytes were
electrically coupled with gap junctions alone or with both the gap junctions and 
the electric field mechanism. Then we found that the action potential propagation
was greatly affected by the subcellular distribution of Na(+) channels in the
presence of the electric field mechanism. The presence of Na(+) channels in the
lateral membrane was important to ensure the stability of propagation under
conditions of reduced gap-junctional coupling. In the poorly coupled tissue with 
sufficient Na(+) channels in the lateral membrane, the slowing of action
potential propagation resulted from the periodic and intermittent dysfunction of 
the electric field mechanism. The changes in the subcellular Na(+) channel
distribution might be in part responsible for the homeostatic excitation
propagation in the diseased heart.

Copyright c 2011 Biophysical Society. Published by Elsevier Inc. All rights
reserved.

PMCID: PMC3030217
PMID: 21281569  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


48. Biophys J. 2000 May;78(5):2392-404.

Action potential and contractility changes in [Na(+)](i) overloaded cardiac
myocytes: a simulation study.

Faber GM(1), Rudy Y.

Author information: 
(1)Cardiac Bioelectricity Research and Training Center and Department of
Biomedical Engineering, Case Western Reserve University, Cleveland, Ohio
44106-7207 USA.

Sodium overload of cardiac cells can accompany various pathologies and induce
fatal cardiac arrhythmias. We investigate effects of elevated intracellular
sodium on the cardiac action potential (AP) and on intracellular calcium using
the Luo-Rudy model of a mammalian ventricular myocyte. The results are: 1) During
rapid pacing, AP duration (APD) shortens in two phases, a rapid phase without
Na(+) accumulation and a slower phase that depends on [Na(+)](i). 2) The rapid
APD shortening is due to incomplete deactivation (accumulation) of I(Ks). 3) The 
slow phase is due to increased repolarizing currents I(NaK) and reverse-mode
I(NaCa), secondary to elevated [Na(+)](i). 4) Na(+)-overload slows the rate of AP
depolarization, allowing time for greater I(Ca(L)) activation; it also enhances
reverse-mode I(NaCa). The resulting increased Ca(2+) influx triggers a greater
[Ca(2+)](i) transient. 5) Reverse-mode I(NaCa) alone can trigger Ca(2+) release
in a voltage and [Na(+)](i)-dependent manner. 6) During I(NaK) block, Na(+) and
Ca(2+) accumulate and APD shortens due to enhanced reverse-mode I(NaCa);
contribution of I(K(Na)) to APD shortening is negligible. By slowing AP
depolarization (hence velocity) and shortening APD, Na(+)-overload acts to
enhance inducibility of reentrant arrhythmias. Shortened APD with elevated
[Ca(2+)](i) (secondary to Na(+)-overload) also predisposes the myocardium to
arrhythmogenic delayed afterdepolarizations.

PMCID: PMC1300828
PMID: 10777735  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


49. PLoS One. 2014 Oct 3;9(10):e109271. doi: 10.1371/journal.pone.0109271.
eCollection 2014.

Ischemia-related subcellular redistribution of sodium channels enhances the
proarrhythmic effect of class I antiarrhythmic drugs: a simulation study.

Tsumoto K(1), Ashihara T(2), Haraguchi R(3), Nakazawa K(4), Kurachi Y(5).

Author information: 
(1)Department of Pharmacology, Graduate school of Medicine, Osaka University,
Suita, Japan. (2)Department of Cardiovascular Medicine, Shiga University of
Medical Science, Otsu, Japan. (3)Department of Medical Informatics, National
Cerebral and Cardiovascular Center, Suita, Japan. (4)Laboratory of Biomedical
Science and Information Management, Research Institute, National Cerebral and
Cardiovascular Center, Suita, Japan. (5)Department of Pharmacology, Graduate
school of Medicine, Osaka University, Suita, Japan; Center for Advanced Medical
Engineering and Informatics, Osaka University, Suita, Japan.

BACKGROUND: Cardiomyocytes located at the ischemic border zone of infarcted
ventricle are accompanied by redistribution of gap junctions, which mediate
electrical transmission between cardiomyocytes. This ischemic border zone
provides an arrhythmogenic substrate. It was also shown that sodium (Na+)
channels are redistributed within myocytes located in the ischemic border zone.
However, the roles of the subcellular redistribution of Na+ channels in the
arrhythmogenicity under ischemia remain unclear.
METHODS: Computer simulations of excitation conduction were performed in a
myofiber model incorporating both subcellular Na+ channel redistribution and the 
electric field mechanism, taking into account the intercellular cleft potentials.
RESULTS: We found in the myofiber model that the subcellular redistribution of
the Na+ channels under myocardial ischemia, decreasing in Na+ channel expression 
of the lateral cell membrane of each myocyte, decreased the tissue excitability, 
resulting in conduction slowing even without any ischemia-related
electrophysiological change. The conventional model (i.e., without the electric
field mechanism) did not reproduce the conduction slowing caused by the
subcellular Na+ channel redistribution. Furthermore, Na+ channel blockade with
the coexistence of a non-ischemic zone with an ischemic border zone expanded the 
vulnerable period for reentrant tachyarrhythmias compared to the model without
the ischemic border zone. Na+ channel blockade tended to cause unidirectional
conduction block at sites near the ischemic border zone. Thus, such a
unidirectional conduction block induced by a premature stimulus at sites near the
ischemic border zone is associated with the initiation of reentrant
tachyarrhythmias.
CONCLUSIONS: Proarrhythmia of Na+ channel blockade in patients with old
myocardial infarction might be partly attributable to the ischemia-related
subcellular Na+ channel redistribution.

PMCID: PMC4184874
PMID: 25279776  [PubMed - in process]


50. Circ Res. 1994 Jun;74(6):1071-96.

A dynamic model of the cardiac ventricular action potential. I. Simulations of
ionic currents and concentration changes.

Luo CH(1), Rudy Y.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Biomedical Engineering, Case Western Reserve University,
Cleveland, OH 44106-7207.

A mathematical model of the cardiac ventricular action potential is presented. In
our previous work, the membrane Na+ current and K+ currents were formulated. The 
present article focuses on processes that regulate intracellular Ca2+ and depend 
on its concentration. The model presented here for the mammalian ventricular
action potential is based mostly on the guinea pig ventricular cell. However, it 
provides the framework for modeling other types of ventricular cells with
appropriate modifications made to account for species differences. The following 
processes are formulated: Ca2+ current through the L-type channel (ICa), the
Na(+)-Ca2+ exchanger, Ca2+ release and uptake by the sarcoplasmic reticulum (SR),
buffering of Ca2+ in the SR and in the myoplasm, a Ca2+ pump in the sarcolemma,
the Na(+)-K+ pump, and a nonspecific Ca(2+)-activated membrane current.
Activation of ICa is an order of magnitude faster than in previous models.
Inactivation of ICa depends on both the membrane voltage and [Ca2+]i. SR is
divided into two subcompartments, a network SR (NSR) and a junctional SR (JSR).
Functionally, Ca2+ enters the NSR and translocates to the JSR following a
monoexponential function. Release of Ca2+ occurs at JSR and can be triggered by
two different mechanisms, Ca(2+)-induced Ca2+ release and spontaneous release.
The model provides the basis for the study of arrhythmogenic activity of the
single myocyte including afterdepolarizations and triggered activity. It can
simulate cellular responses under different degrees of Ca2+ overload. Such
simulations are presented in our accompanying article in this issue of
Circulation Research.

PMID: 7514509  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


51. Eur J Pharmacol. 2004 Jun 16;493(1-3):29-40.

Comparison of kinetic properties of quinidine and dofetilide block of HERG
channels.

Tsujimae K(1), Suzuki S, Yamada M, Kurachi Y.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Pharmacology II, Graduate School of Medicine, A7, Osaka
University, 2-2 Yamada-oka, Suita, Osaka 565-0874, Japan.

Many drugs inhibit human ether-a-go-go related gene (HERG) current and prolong
cardiac action potential duration. We examined the kinetic properties of
quinidine block of HERG channels expressed in Xenopus oocytes in comparison with 
those of the block by a class III antiarrhythmic dofetilide. Both of the drugs
inhibited HERG currents in a use-dependent and frequency-independent manner.
However, the underlying mechanisms were different. Under the steady state,
quinidine block was voltage- and time-dependent. At positive membrane potentials,
the onset of block was very fast. Thus, quinidine caused frequency-independent
block mainly through this fast blocking kinetic. In contrast, dofetilide blocked 
HERG currents in a voltage- and time-independent manner under the steady state
because of very slow unblocking at negative potentials, which also caused
frequency-independent block. Therefore, quinidine and dofetilide might cause the 
reverse frequency-dependent prolongation of action potential duration through
distinct mechanisms with regard to blocking and unblocking kinetics.

Copyright 2004 Elsevier B.V.

PMID: 15189761  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


52. Channels (Austin). 2007 May-Jun;1(3):198-208. Epub 2007 Jul 6.

Mutational analysis of block and facilitation of HERG current by a class III
anti-arrhythmic agent, nifekalant.

Hosaka Y(1), Iwata M, Kamiya N, Yamada M, Kinoshita K, Fukunishi Y, Tsujimae K,
Hibino H, Aizawa Y, Inanobe A, Nakamura H, Kurachi Y.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Pharmacology, Graduate School of Medicine, Osaka University,
Osaka, Japan.

Chemicals and toxins are useful tools to elucidate the structure-function
relationship of various proteins including ion channels. The HERG channel is
blocked by many compounds and this may cause life-threatening cardiac arrhythmia.
Besides block, some chemicals such as the class III anti-arrhythmic agent
nifekalant stimulate HERG at low potentials by shifting its activation curve
towards hyperpolarizing voltages. This is called "facilitation". Here, we report 
mutations and simulations analyzing the association between nifekalant and
channel pore residues for block and facilitation. Alanine-scanning mutagenesis
was performed in the pore region of HERG. The mutations at the base of the pore
helix (T623A), the selectivity filter (V625A) and the S6 helix (G648A, Y652A and 
F656A) abolished and S624A attenuated both block and facilitation induced by the 
drug. On the other hand, the mutation of other residues caused either an increase
or a decrease in nifekalant-induced facilitation without affecting block. An
open-state homology model of the HERG pore suggested that T623, S624, Y652 and
F656 faced the central cavity, and were positioned within geometrical range for
the drug to be able to interact with all of them at the same time. Of these, S649
was the only polar residue located within possible interaction distance from the 
drug held in its blocking position. Further mutations and flexible-docking
simulations suggest that the size, but not the polarity, of the side chain at
S649 is critical for drug induced facilitation.

PMID: 18690032  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


53. Biochem Biophys Res Commun. 2011 Nov 11;415(1):141-6. doi:
10.1016/j.bbrc.2011.10.034. Epub 2011 Oct 12.

A mechanism underlying compound-induced voltage shift in the current activation
of hERG by antiarrhythmic agents.

Furutani K(1), Yamakawa Y, Inanobe A, Iwata M, Ohno Y, Kurachi Y.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Pharmacology, Graduate School of Medicine, Osaka University,
Osaka, Japan. furutani@pharma2.med.osaka-u.ac.jp

Nifekalant and azimilide, Class III antiarrhythmic agents, block the human
ether-a-go-go-related gene K(+) (hERG) channel. However, when a depolarizing
membrane potential is applied, they also increase the current at low potentials
by shifting its activation curve towards hyperpolarizing voltages. This
phenomenon is called 'facilitation'. In this study, we tried to address the
mechanism underlying the facilitation by analyzing the effects of various
compounds on hERG expressed in Xenopus oocytes. Like nifekalant, amiodarone,
quinidine and carvedilol, but not by dofetilide, caused the current facilitation 
of hERG, suggesting that the facilitation is a common effect to a subset of hERG 
blockers. As the concentration of each compound was increased, the total hERG
current was suppressed progressively, while the current at low potentials was
augmented. Activation curves of the remaining hERG current in the facilitation
condition could be described as the sum of two Boltzmann functions reflecting two
populations of hERG currents having different activation curves. The voltage
shift in the activation curve from control was constant for each compound even at
different concentrations; -31 mV in amiodarone, -27 mV in nifekalant, -17 mV in
quinidine and -12 mV in carvedilol. Therefore, the facilitation is based on the
appearance of hERG whose voltage-dependence for the activation is shifted towards
hyperpolarizing voltages.

Copyright c 2011 Elsevier Inc. All rights reserved.

PMID: 22020101  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


54. Circ Res. 1998 Jun 15;82(11):1206-23.

Simulation study of cellular electric properties in heart failure.

Priebe L(1), Beuckelmann DJ.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Medicine III, University of Cologne, Germany.

Patients with severe heart failure are at high risk of sudden cardiac death. In
the majority of these patients, sudden cardiac death is thought to be due to
ventricular tachyarrhythmias. Alterations of the electric properties of single
myocytes in heart failure may favor the occurrence of ventricular arrhythmias in 
these patients by inducing early or delayed afterdepolarizations. Mathematical
models of the cellular action potential and its underlying ionic currents could
help to elucidate possible arrhythmogenic mechanisms on a cellular level. In the 
present study, selected ionic currents based on human data are incorporated into 
a model of the ventricular action potential for the purpose of studying the
cellular electrophysiological consequences of heart failure. Ionic currents that 
are not yet sufficiently characterized in human ventricular myocytes are adopted 
from the action potential model developed by Luo and Rudy (LR model). The main
results obtained from this model are as follows: The action potential in
ventricular myocytes from failing hearts is longer than in nonfailing control
hearts. The major underlying mechanisms for this prolongation are the enhanced
activity of the Na+-Ca2+ exchanger, the slowed diastolic decay of the [Ca2+]i
transient, and the reduction of the inwardly rectifying K+ current and the Na+-K+
pump current in myocytes of failing hearts. Furthermore, the fast and slow
components of the delayed rectifier K+ current (I(Kr) and I(Ks), respectively)
are of utmost importance in determining repolarization of the human ventricular
action potential. In contrast, the influence of the transient outward K+ current 
on APD is only small in both cell groups. Inhibition of I(Kr) promotes the
development of early afterdepolarizations in failing, but not nonfailing,
myocytes. Furthermore, spontaneous Ca2+ release from the sarcoplasmic reticulum
triggers a premature action potential only in failing myocytes. This model of the
ventricular action potential and its alterations in heart failure is intended to 
serve as a tool for investigating the effects of therapeutic interventions on the
electric excitability of the human ventricular myocardium.

PMID: 9633920  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


55. PLoS Comput Biol. 2011 May;7(5):e1002061. doi: 10.1371/journal.pcbi.1002061. Epub
2011 May 26.

Simulation of the undiseased human cardiac ventricular action potential: model
formulation and experimental validation.

O'Hara T(1), Virag L, Varro A, Rudy Y.

Author information: 
(1)Cardiac Bioelectricity and Arrhythmia Center, Department of Biomedical
Engineering, Washington University in St. Louis, St. Louis, Missouri, USA.

Cellular electrophysiology experiments, important for understanding cardiac
arrhythmia mechanisms, are usually performed with channels expressed in non
myocytes, or with non-human myocytes. Differences between cell types and species 
affect results. Thus, an accurate model for the undiseased human ventricular
action potential (AP) which reproduces a broad range of physiological behaviors
is needed. Such a model requires extensive experimental data, but essential
elements have been unavailable. Here, we develop a human ventricular AP model
using new undiseased human ventricular data: Ca(2+) versus voltage dependent
inactivation of L-type Ca(2+) current (I(CaL)); kinetics for the transient
outward, rapid delayed rectifier (I(Kr)), Na(+)/Ca(2+) exchange (I(NaCa)), and
inward rectifier currents; AP recordings at all physiological cycle lengths; and 
rate dependence and restitution of AP duration (APD) with and without a variety
of specific channel blockers. Simulated APs reproduced the experimental AP
morphology, APD rate dependence, and restitution. Using undiseased human mRNA and
protein data, models for different transmural cell types were developed.
Experiments for rate dependence of Ca(2+) (including peak and decay) and
intracellular sodium ([Na(+)](i)) in undiseased human myocytes were
quantitatively reproduced by the model. Early afterdepolarizations were induced
by I(Kr) block during slow pacing, and AP and Ca(2+) alternans appeared at rates 
>200 bpm, as observed in the nonfailing human ventricle.
Ca(2+)/calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II (CaMK) modulated rate dependence of
Ca(2+) cycling. I(NaCa) linked Ca(2+) alternation to AP alternans. CaMK
suppression or SERCA upregulation eliminated alternans. Steady state APD rate
dependence was caused primarily by changes in [Na(+)](i), via its modulation of
the electrogenic Na(+)/K(+) ATPase current. At fast pacing rates, late Na(+)
current and I(CaL) were also contributors. APD shortening during restitution was 
primarily dependent on reduced late Na(+) and I(CaL) currents due to inactivation
at short diastolic intervals, with additional contribution from elevated I(Kr)
due to incomplete deactivation.

PMCID: PMC3102752
PMID: 21637795  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


56. Neural Comput. 1995 Mar;7(2):307-37.

Synchrony in excitatory neural networks.

Hansel D(1), Mato G, Meunier C.

Author information: 
(1)Centre de Physique Theorique, UPR014 CNRS, Ecole Polytechnique, Palaiseau,
France.

Synchronization properties of fully connected networks of identical oscillatory
neurons are studied, assuming purely excitatory interactions. We analyze their
dependence on the time course of the synaptic interaction and on the response of 
the neurons to small depolarizations. Two types of responses are distinguished.
In the first type, neurons always respond to small depolarization by advancing
the next spike. In the second type, an excitatory postsynaptic potential (EPSP)
received after the refractory period delays the firing of the next spike, while
an EPSP received at a later time advances the firing. For these two types of
responses we derive general conditions under which excitation destabilizes
in-phase synchrony. We show that excitation is generally desynchronizing for
neurons with a response of type I but can be synchronizing for responses of type 
II when the synaptic interactions are fast. These results are illustrated on
three models of neurons: the Lapicque integrate-and-fire model, the model of
Connor et al., and the Hodgkin-Huxley model. The latter exhibits a type II
response, at variance with the first two models, that have type I responses. We
then examine the consequences of these results for large networks, focusing on
the states of partial coherence that emerge. Finally, we study the Lapicque model
and the model of Connor et al. at large coupling and show that excitation can be 
desynchronizing even beyond the weak coupling regime.

PMID: 8974733  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


57. Am J Physiol. 1998 Jul;275(1 Pt 2):H301-21.

Ionic mechanisms underlying human atrial action potential properties: insights
from a mathematical model.

Courtemanche M(1), Ramirez RJ, Nattel S.

Author information: 
(1)Research Center, Montreal Heart Institute, Montreal, Quebec H1T 1C8, Canada.

The mechanisms underlying many important properties of the human atrial action
potential (AP) are poorly understood. Using specific formulations of the K+, Na+,
and Ca2+ currents based on data recorded from human atrial myocytes, along with
representations of pump, exchange, and background currents, we developed a
mathematical model of the AP. The model AP resembles APs recorded from human
atrial samples and responds to rate changes, L-type Ca2+ current blockade,
Na+/Ca2+ exchanger inhibition, and variations in transient outward current
amplitude in a fashion similar to experimental recordings. Rate-dependent
adaptation of AP duration, an important determinant of susceptibility to atrial
fibrillation, was attributable to incomplete L-type Ca2+ current recovery from
inactivation and incomplete delayed rectifier current deactivation at rapid
rates. Experimental observations of variable AP morphology could be accounted for
by changes in transient outward current density, as suggested experimentally. We 
conclude that this mathematical model of the human atrial AP reproduces a variety
of observed AP behaviors and provides insights into the mechanisms of clinically 
important AP properties.

PMID: 9688927  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


58. Am J Physiol Heart Circ Physiol. 2007 Jul;293(1):H660-9. Epub 2007 Jan 12.

Frequency-dependent effects of various IKr blockers on cardiac action potential
duration in a human atrial model.

Tsujimae K(1), Suzuki S, Murakami S, Kurachi Y.

Author information: 
(1)Division of Molecular and Cellular Pharmacology, Department of Pharmacology,
Graduate School of Medicine, Osaka University, 2-2 Yamada-oka, Suita, Osaka
565-0871, Japan.

Rapidly activating K(+) current (I(Kr)) blockers prolong action potential (AP)
duration (APD) in a reverse-frequency-dependent manner and may induce
arrhythmias, including torsade de pointes in the ventricle. The I(Kr) blocker
dofetilide has been approved for treatment of atrial arrhythmias, including
fibrillation. There are, however, a limited number of studies on the action of
I(Kr) blockers on atrial AP. When we tested a mathematical model of the human
atrial AP (M Courtemanche, RJ Ramirez, S Nattel. Am J Physiol Heart Circ Physiol 
275: H301-H321, 1998) to examine the effects of dofetilide-type I(Kr) blockade,
this model could not reproduce the reverse-frequency-dependent nature of I(Kr)
blockade on atrial APD. We modified the model by introducing a slowly activating 
K(+) current activation parameter. As the slow time constant was increased,
dofetilide-type blockade induced more prominent reverse-frequency-dependent APD
prolongation. Using the modified model, we also examined the effects of two more 
types of I(Kr) blockade similar to those of quinidine and vesnarinone. Voltage-
and time-dependent block of I(Kr) through the onset of inhibition by quinidine is
much faster than by vesnarinone. When we incorporated the kinetics of the effects
of these drugs on I(Kr) into the model, we found that quinidine-type blockade
caused a reverse-frequency-dependent prolongation of APD that was similar to the 
effect of dofetilide-type blockade, whereas vesnarinone-type blockade did not.
This finding coincides with experimental observations. The lack of the reverse
frequency dependence in vesnarinone-type blockade was accounted for by the slow
development of I(Kr) blockade at depolarized potentials. These results suggest
that the voltage- and time-dependent nature of I(Kr) blockade by drugs may be
critical for the phenotype of the drug effect on atrial AP.

PMID: 17220183  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


59. Jpn J Physiol. 1980;30(6):841-57.

Reconstruction of sino-atrial node pacemaker potential based on the voltage clamp
experiments.

Yanagihara K, Noma A, Irisawa H.

The pacemaker activity of the S-A node cell was explained by reconstructing the
pacemaker potential using a Hodgkin-Huxley type mathematical model which was
based on the reported voltage clamp data. In this model four dynamic currents,
the sodium current iNa, the slow inward current, is, the potassium current, iK,
and the hyperpolarization-activated current, ih, in addition to a time-dependent 
leak current, i1 were included. The model simulated the spontaneous action
potential the current voltage relationship, and the voltage clamp experiment in
normal Tyrode solution of the rabbit S-A node. Furthermore, the changes of
activity induced by the potassium current blocker Ba2+, by applying constant
current, acetylcholine, and epinephrine were also reconstructed. It was strongly 
suggested that the pacemaker depolarization in the S-A node cell is mainly due to
a gradual increase of iS during diastole, and that the contribution of iK is much
less compared to the potassium current iK2 in the Purkinje fiber pacemaker
depolarization. The rising phase of the action potential was due to iS and the
plateau phase is determined by both the inactivation of iS and activation of iK.

PMID: 7265560  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


60. PLoS One. 2014 Jan 8;9(1):e84401. doi: 10.1371/journal.pone.0084401. eCollection 
2014.

A quantitative comparison of the behavior of human ventricular cardiac
electrophysiology models in tissue.

Elshrif MM(1), Cherry EM(2).

Author information: 
(1)B. Thomas Golisano College of Computing and Information Sciences, Rochester
Institute of Technology, Rochester, New York, United States of America. (2)School
of Mathematical Sciences, Rochester Institute of Technology, Rochester, New York,
United States of America.

Numerical integration of mathematical models of heart cell electrophysiology
provides an important computational tool for studying cardiac arrhythmias, but
the abundance of available models complicates selecting an appropriate model. We 
study the behavior of two recently published models of human ventricular action
potentials, the Grandi-Pasqualini-Bers (GPB) and the O'Hara-Virag-Varro-Rudy
(OVVR) models, and compare the results with four previously published models and 
with available experimental and clinical data. We find the shapes and durations
of action potentials and calcium transients differ between the GPB and OVVR
models, as do the magnitudes and rate-dependent properties of transmembrane
currents and the calcium transient. Differences also occur in the steady-state
and S1-S2 action potential duration and conduction velocity restitution curves,
including a maximum conduction velocity for the OVVR model roughly half that of
the GPB model and well below clinical values. Between single cells and tissue,
both models exhibit differences in properties, including maximum upstroke
velocity, action potential amplitude, and minimum diastolic interval. Compared to
experimental data, action potential durations for the GPB and OVVR models agree
fairly well (although OVVR epicardial action potentials are shorter), but maximum
slopes of steady-state restitution curves are smaller. Although studies show
alternans in normal hearts, it occurs only in the OVVR model, and only for a
narrow range of cycle lengths. We find initiated spiral waves do not progress to 
sustained breakup for either model. The dominant spiral wave period of the GPB
model falls within clinically relevant values for ventricular tachycardia (VT),
but for the OVVR model, the dominant period is longer than periods associated
with VT. Our results should facilitate choosing a model to match properties of
interest in human cardiac tissue and to replicate arrhythmia behavior more
closely. Furthermore, by indicating areas where existing models disagree, our
findings suggest avenues for further experimental work.

PMCID: PMC3885549
PMID: 24416228  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


61. Am J Physiol Heart Circ Physiol. 2004 Apr;286(4):H1573-89. Epub 2003 Dec 4.

A model for human ventricular tissue.

ten Tusscher KH(1), Noble D, Noble PJ, Panfilov AV.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Theoretical Biology, Utrecht University, 3584 CH Utrecht, The
Netherlands. khwjtuss@hotmail.com

Comment in
    Am J Physiol Heart Circ Physiol. 2005 Jan;288(1):H453; author reply H453-4.

The experimental and clinical possibilities for studying cardiac arrhythmias in
human ventricular myocardium are very limited. Therefore, the use of alternative 
methods such as computer simulations is of great importance. In this article we
introduce a mathematical model of the action potential of human ventricular cells
that, while including a high level of electrophysiological detail, is
computationally cost-effective enough to be applied in large-scale spatial
simulations for the study of reentrant arrhythmias. The model is based on recent 
experimental data on most of the major ionic currents: the fast sodium, L-type
calcium, transient outward, rapid and slow delayed rectifier, and inward
rectifier currents. The model includes a basic calcium dynamics, allowing for the
realistic modeling of calcium transients, calcium current inactivation, and the
contraction staircase. We are able to reproduce human epicardial, endocardial,
and M cell action potentials and show that differences can be explained by
differences in the transient outward and slow delayed rectifier currents. Our
model reproduces the experimentally observed data on action potential duration
restitution, which is an important characteristic for reentrant arrhythmias. The 
conduction velocity restitution of our model is broader than in other models and 
agrees better with available data. Finally, we model the dynamics of spiral wave 
rotation in a two-dimensional sheet of human ventricular tissue and show that the
spiral wave follows a complex meandering pattern and has a period of 265 ms. We
conclude that the proposed model reproduces a variety of electrophysiological
behaviors and provides a basis for studies of reentrant arrhythmias in human
ventricular tissue.

PMID: 14656705  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


62. Biophys J. 2005 Oct;89(4):2865-87. Epub 2005 Jul 22.

Dynamical mechanisms of pacemaker generation in IK1-downregulated human
ventricular myocytes: insights from bifurcation analyses of a mathematical model.

Kurata Y(1), Hisatome I, Matsuda H, Shibamoto T.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Physiology, Kanazawa Medical University, Ishikawa 920-0293,
Japan. yasu@kanazawa-med.ac.jp

Dynamical mechanisms of the biological pacemaker (BP) generation in human
ventricular myocytes were investigated by bifurcation analyses of a mathematical 
model. Equilibrium points (EPs), periodic orbits, stability of EPs, and
bifurcation points were determined as functions of bifurcation parameters, such
as the maximum conductance of inward-rectifier K+ current (I(K1)), for
constructing bifurcation diagrams. Stable limit cycles (BP activity) abruptly
appeared around an unstable EP via a saddle-node bifurcation when I(K1) was
suppressed by 84.6%. After the bifurcation at which a stable EP disappears, the
I(K1)-reduced system has an unstable EP only, which is essentially important for 
stable pacemaking. To elucidate how individual sarcolemmal currents contribute to
EP instability and BP generation, we further explored the bifurcation structures 
of the system during changes in L-type Ca2+ channel current (I(Ca,L)),
delayed-rectifier K+ currents (I(K)), or Na(+)/Ca2+ exchanger current (I(NaCa)). 
Our results suggest that 1), I(Ca,L) is, but I(K) or I(NaCa) is not, responsible 
for EP instability as a requisite to stable BP generation; 2), I(K) is
indispensable for robust pacemaking with large amplitude, high upstroke velocity,
and stable frequency; and 3), I(NaCa) is the dominant pacemaker current but is
not necessarily required for the generation of spontaneous oscillations.

PMCID: PMC1366784
PMID: 16040746  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


63. Biochim Biophys Acta. 2011 Nov;1812(11):1452-9. doi:
10.1016/j.bbadis.2011.07.011. Epub 2011 Jul 24.

Identification and functional characterization of KCNQ1 mutations around the exon
7-intron 7 junction affecting the splicing process.

Tsuji-Wakisaka K(1), Akao M, Ishii TM, Ashihara T, Makiyama T, Ohno S, Toyoda F, 
Dochi K, Matsuura H, Horie M.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Cardiovascular and Respiratory Medicine, Shiga University of
Medical Science, Otsu, Japan.

BACKGROUND: KCNQ1 gene encodes the delayed rectifier K(+) channel in cardiac
muscle, and its mutations cause long QT syndrome type 1 (LQT1). Especially
exercise-related cardiac events predominate in LQT1. We previously reported that 
a KCNQ1 splicing mutation displays LQT1 phenotypes.
METHODS AND RESULTS: We identified novel mutation at the third base of intron 7
(IVS7 +3A>G) in exercise-induced LQT1 patients. Minigene assay in COS7 cells and 
RT-PCR analysis of patients' lymphocytes demonstrated the presence of exon
7-deficient mRNA in IVS7 +3A>G, as well as c.1032G>A, but not in c.1022C>T.
Real-time RT-PCR demonstrated that both IVS7 +3A>G and c.1032G>A carrier
expressed significant amounts of exon-skipping mRNAs (18.8% and 44.8% of total
KCNQ1 mRNA). Current recordings from Xenopus oocytes injected cRNA by simulating 
its ratios of exon skipping displayed a significant reduction in currents to 64.8
} 4.5% for IVS7 +3A>G and to 41.4 } 9.5% for c.1032G>A carrier, respectively,
compared to the condition without splicing error. Computer simulation
incorporating these quantitative results revealed the pronounced QT prolongation 
under beta-adrenergic stimulation in IVS7 +3A>G carrier model.
CONCLUSION: Here we report a novel splicing mutation IVS7 +3A>G, identified in a 
family with mild form LQT1 phenotypes, and examined functional outcome in
comparison with three other variants around the exon 7-intron 7 junction. In
addition to c.1032G>A mutation, IVS7 +3A>G generates exon-skipping mRNAs, and
thereby causing LQT1 phenotype. The severity of clinical phenotypes appeared to
differ between the two splicing-related mutations and to result from the amount
of resultant mRNAs and their functional consequences.

2011 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.

PMID: 21810471  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


64. Biophys J. 1995 Mar;68(3):949-64.

Early afterdepolarizations in cardiac myocytes: mechanism and rate dependence.

Zeng J(1), Rudy Y.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Biomedical Engineering, Case Western Reserve University,
Cleveland, Ohio 44106-7207, USA.

A model of the cardiac ventricular action potential that accounts for dynamic
changes in ionic concentrations was used to study the mechanism, characteristics,
and rate dependence of early after depolarizations (EADs). A simulation approach 
to the study of the effects of pharmacological agents on cellular processes was
introduced. The simulation results are qualitatively consistent with experimental
observations and help resolve contradictory conclusions in the literature
regarding the mechanism of EADs. Our results demonstrate that: 1) the L-type
calcium current, ICa, is necessary as a depolarizing charge carrier during an
EAD; 2) recovery and reactivation of ICa is the mechanism of EAD formation,
independent of the intervention used to induce the EADs (cesium, Bay K 8644, or
isoproterenol were used in our simulations, following similar published
experimental protocols); 3) high [Ca2+]i is not required for EADs to develop and 
calcium release by the sarcoplasmic reticulum does not occur during the EAD; 4)
although the primary mechanism of EAD formation is recovery of ICa, other plateau
currents can modulate EAD formation by affecting the balance of currents during a
conditional phase before the EAD take-off; and 5) EADs are present at drive cycle
lengths longer than 1000 ms. Because of the very long activation time constant of
the delayed rectifier potassium current, IK, the activation gate of IK does not
deactivate completely between consecutive stimuli at fast rates (drive cycle
length < 1000 ms). As a result, IK plays a key role in determining the rate
dependence of EADs.

PMCID: PMC1281819
PMID: 7538806  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


65. Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A. 2004 May 4;101(18):7152-7. Epub 2004 Apr 21.

A role for fast rhythmic bursting neurons in cortical gamma oscillations in
vitro.

Cunningham MO(1), Whittington MA, Bibbig A, Roopun A, LeBeau FE, Vogt A, Monyer
H, Buhl EH, Traub RD.

Author information: 
(1)School of Biomedical Sciences, The Worsley Building, University of Leeds,
Leeds LS2 9JT, United Kingdom.

Basic cellular and network mechanisms underlying gamma frequency oscillations
(30-80 Hz) have been well characterized in the hippocampus and associated
structures. In these regions, gamma rhythms are seen as an emergent property of
networks of principal cells and fast-spiking interneurons. In contrast, in the
neocortex a number of elegant studies have shown that specific types of principal
neuron exist that are capable of generating powerful gamma frequency outputs on
the basis of their intrinsic conductances alone. These fast rhythmic bursting
(FRB) neurons (sometimes referred to as "chattering" cells) are activated by
sensory stimuli and generate multiple action potentials per gamma period. Here,
we demonstrate that FRB neurons may function by providing a large-scale input to 
an axon plexus consisting of gap-junctionally connected axons from both FRB
neurons and their anatomically similar counterparts regular spiking neurons. The 
resulting network gamma oscillation shares all of the properties of gamma
oscillations generated in the hippocampus but with the additional critical
dependence on multiple spiking in FRB cells.

PMCID: PMC406481
PMID: 15103017  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


66. J Neurophysiol. 2003 Feb;89(2):909-21.

Fast rhythmic bursting can be induced in layer 2/3 cortical neurons by enhancing 
persistent Na+ conductance or by blocking BK channels.

Traub RD(1), Buhl EH, Gloveli T, Whittington MA.

Author information: 
(1)Department of Physiology and Pharmacology, State University of New York Health
Science Center, Brooklyn, New York 11203, USA. roger.traub@downstate.edu

Fast rhythmic bursting (or "chattering") is a firing pattern exhibited by
selected neocortical neurons in cats in vivo and in slices of adult ferret and
cat brain. Fast rhythmic bursting (FRB) has been recorded in certain superficial 
and deep principal neurons and in aspiny presumed local circuit neurons; it can
be evoked by depolarizing currents or by sensory stimulation and has been
proposed to depend on a persistent g(Na) that causes spike depolarizing
afterpotentials. We constructed a multicompartment 11-conductance model of a
layer 2/3 pyramidal neuron, containing apical dendritic calcium-mediated
electrogenesis; the model can switch between rhythmic spiking (RS) and FRB modes 
of firing, with various parameter changes. FRB in this model is favored by
enhancing persistent g(Na) and also by measures that reduce [Ca(2+)](i) or that
reduce the conductance of g(K(C)) (a fast voltage- and Ca(2+)-dependent
conductance). Axonal excitability plays a critical role in generating fast bursts
in the model. In vitro experiments in rat layer 2/3 neurons confirmed (as shown
previously by others) that RS firing could be switched to fast rhythmic bursting,
either by buffering [Ca(2+)](i) or by enhancing persistent g(Na). In addition,
our experiments confirmed the model prediction that reducing g(KC) (with
iberiotoxin) would favor FRB. During the bursts, fast prepotentials (spikelets)
could occur that did not originate in apical dendrites and that appear to derive 
from the axon. We suggest that modulator-induced regulation of [Ca(2+)] dynamics 
or of BK channel conductance, for example via protein kinase A, could play a role
in determining the firing pattern of neocortical neurons; specifically, such
modulation could play a role in regulating whether neurons respond to strong
stimulation with fast rhythmic bursts.

PMID: 12574468  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]


67. Eur J Neurosci. 2014 Jan;39(1):24-34. doi: 10.1111/ejn.12388. Epub 2013 Oct 23.

Cell-type-dependent action potentials and voltage-gated currents in mouse
fungiform taste buds.

Kimura K(1), Ohtubo Y, Tateno K, Takeuchi K, Kumazawa T, Yoshii K.

Author information: 
(1)Graduate school of Life Science and Systems Engineering, Kyushu Institute of
Technology, Hibikino 2-4, Kitakyushu-shi, 808-0196, Japan.

Taste receptor cells fire action potentials in response to taste substances to
trigger non-exocytotic neurotransmitter release in type II cells and exocytotic
release in type III cells. We investigated possible differences between these
action potentials fired by mouse taste receptor cells using in situ whole-cell
recordings, and subsequently we identified their cell types immunologically with 
cell-type markers, an IP3 receptor (IP3 R3) for type II cells and a SNARE protein
(SNAP-25) for type III cells. Cells not immunoreactive to these antibodies were
examined as non-IRCs. Here, we show that type II cells and type III cells fire
action potentials using different ionic mechanisms, and that non-IRCs also fire
action potentials with either of the ionic mechanisms. The width of action
potentials was significantly narrower and their afterhyperpolarization was deeper
in type III cells than in type II cells. Na(+) current density was similar in
type II cells and type III cells, but it was significantly smaller in non-IRCs
than in the others. Although outwardly rectifying current density was similar
between type II cells and type III cells, tetraethylammonium (TEA) preferentially
suppressed the density in type III cells and the majority of non-IRCs. Our
mathematical model revealed that the shape of action potentials depended on the
ratio of TEA-sensitive current density and TEA-insensitive current one. The
action potentials of type II cells and type III cells under physiological
conditions are discussed.

c 2013 Federation of European Neuroscience Societies and John Wiley & Sons Ltd.

PMID: 24152110  [PubMed - indexed for MEDLINE]
